fiRM fOUNDATION lt94sl A National Weekl y, World-W ide In ,M i eslon, Deftnlte In Pollcy~tha Def ense ot the Anci ent Gospel Delivered to tbe Salnta. Under ~·
en t Management tor last 36 Years. The F irm Foundation ot God Standeth having th!M •&AL The Lord knoweth them that are hU" ========================================~~==I~T·Im.==z=:1=9.==========================================~~
Vol. 62, No. 21] Austin, Texas, Tuesday, May 22, 1945 [ $2.00 Per Year In Advance ~~-=~_=_=_=_=~_=_=_==_==_==~~~-=_==_=_== __ · --··---------------------------~'
THINGS TO CONSIDER ·. I I • •
Indictment of Science Science Is a fine thing when it is kept in ils place, but a very dangerous thing when used in the wrong way. So many scienti fic discoveries bad been made that men just had to have a war to try them out. Fo1· half a century science Jtas been applied more to war than to any other one thing. rt was science that caused the German doctors and laboratory technicians to use men, women and children in the concentration camps instead of guinea pigs, in making their ex:periments. One great weakness of science is that it causes men to put a low estimate on human life. The " survival of the fittest" is regarded by most scientists as a fundamental idea. And that idea causes the strong to try to destroy the weak. Have you noticed that it nearly al,,ays falls? Adolf Hitler enlisted the cooperation of all the German scientists in building up his war machine.
In his opinion Germans were super -men, and his purpose was to destroy all weaklings.
One thing that this outfit never figures on is, that there is a God in the universe who "makes the wrath of man to vraise him." The fall of Germany is the debacle of science. Science may be used for the betterment of humanity or it may bE! used for the destruction of humanitY.
ported to the king concerning an approaching chariot, he said, "And the driving is like the driving of Jehu the son of Nimshl, for •be driveth furiQusly" ( 2 Kings 9: 20). Benito Mussolini preached the doctrine of living dangerously. Behold! how he died. The world has been cursed with furious characters for a long time. Serious minded statesmen are making a big effort to promote peace among the nations, but their efforts will not amount to much if furious men are apowed to lead.
AI). ambitious man will lay out a program and execute it furiously. Jehu did that way. He served the Lord's PUl'J)Ose In a way, but he failed to stop at the right place. Many people waste their energy and destroy their usefu I ness by living furiously.
The whole world has become speedminded.
Men want everything streamlined.
They are no longer satisfied to '"alk or run; they want to fly. Men are falling dead, right and left, by their high pressure way of living. They would 1 atller make speed and die, than to go slow and live.
Dr. Victor Robinson in his book entitled.
"The Story of Medicine," declares the speed habit is an American feve'r. He says the American bTand of civlllzation is built on speed and noise. His advice is not so much exciting amusement, but more real pleasure--not so much wealth, but more enjoyment of what we have.
Above all let us "take time to be holy."
Quietness and •holiness go together. Rash people usually commit sin and give very little attention to holiness. "One step at a time" is the way the Lord wants us to go. Those who try to make speed in holiness and righteousness usually get off the track. Jehu drove furiously against men and succeeded, but when he tried that with the Lord he failed.
Marlin, Texas.
CHRISTIAN SCIENCEAnother ~~Gospel(?)"
Luther 'V. l\1nrtin "Though we, or an angel from heaven, preach any-other gospel unto you than that which we have preached unto you, let him be accursed'' (Gal. 1:8).
Mrs. Eddy Teaches Tbnt n. 1\lere Book Heals Disease James says, "But if ye have bitter envying and strife in your hearts, glory not and lie not against the truth. This wisdom descendetb not from above, but is eaTthlY, sensual, devilish. For where envying and strife is, there is confusion and every evil work. But the wisdom which is !rom above is first pure, then peaceable, gentle and easy to be entreated; full of mercy and ~;ood fruit, without partia lity and without hypoc1·isy" (Jas. 3:14-17). We are here taught that worldly wisdom causes envy and strHe; it causes men to He agahist the truth.
The Nazi philosophy teaches that it is a vice to love your fellowman, especia lly if be is weak; and that it is praiseworthy to hate him. This is a lie against the truth.
The man who is puffed up with worldly wisdom glories in himsel!. If the Bible teaches 1t theory that is different from his, he says the Bible is WTong. And the man with a head !\rtl of worldly wisdom cannot be taught the truth.
The above wr itten words of the apostle Paul brand forever ally teaching under the cloaK: of religion as behv; false when it differs in any r espect with the reve1ation from God as given to the apostles. Even soJ being altogether unmindful of Paul's writings to the churches in Galatia, Mrs. Mary Ball:er Glover Patterson Eddy proclaimed herself to be the "discoverer and founder" of Christian Science. As a basis for her "strange gospel" it was necessary that she write out some form of dectrlne which would appeal to the public in order that followers might be acquired. This she did, particularly ln the book enti tled, "Science and Health, With Key to the Scriptures,"
although many other writings have been " accredited" to her pen.
"Reading Science and Health has restored the sick to health." (No and Yes, 1)1lge 4). In this statement nothing is said about even believing that which one might read in "Science and J;Iealth," the mere reaaing Is, so Mrs. Eddy writes, capable of restoring the sick back to health.
Personally, I should be equally ready to accept the Roman Catholic medals and figures designed to keep me !rom harm, or the incense and any other offering that I might make to Bhudda, as to believe such an absurd claim.
At this point, it would be most interesting to consider Mrs. Eddy's comments upon the work of her last husband, "Dr."
Asa Gilbert Eddy. On page 42,' of her book, "Retrospection and Introspection,"
she wrote concerning him: "He forsook Driving Like Jehu all to follow In this line of light. He was When the watchman on the tower rePage Two FIRM FOUNDATION Publis h ed Weelcly by the Firm ~~oundatlon Publishing House, Austin, Texas, G. H. P . Show alter, Editor .
Entered at the Post Ofl'lce at Aus tin, Texas, as second-class matter, unde r net o! .!'larch 3
1873.
Adve rtising r ates sent upon r eQuest.
FIRM FOUNDATION PUBLISHING HOUSE Austin, Texa~<
the first organizer of a Christian Science Sunday School, which he superintended.
He also t aught a special Bible class ; and he lectured so ably on scriptural topics that clergymen of other denominations listened to him with deep interest." Inasmuch as Mrs. Eddy was writing about her husband, doubtless she spoke very modestly as to his accomplishments. There is no doubt whatsoever as to his being very well acquainted with h61' writings-pa rticularly Science and Health-yet, even though this book supposedly heals sickness, poor Mrs.
Eddy died of a heart disease. For that matter, although no physician was called until after death, Mrs. Eddy herself the "Discoverer and Founder" of Christian Science and etc., died in December, 1910, from tha t which was diagnosed as pneumonia.
?tfrs. Eddy's Sennons Heal the Sick Also 1'n order to prevent the worldly acclaim and glory of her writings from completely overshadowing her own personal achievements, 1\'lrs. Eddy made this clear and put it on paper in "Retrospection and Introspection,"
page 16: "It was not an uncommon occurrence in my own church for the sick to be h ealed by my sermon." First, I call your a ttention to the fact that these "miracles" occurred in her church. To be sure, it was her own words which precipitated such a wondrous power . Second, she states that her sermons healed the s ick. I wonder why a sermon was r equired when Christ healed instantly? and with only a sentence? These excerpts from her writings a re mentioned in order to show the importance which she placed not only u pon her written works but also upon her spoken words.
?tfrs. Eddy's Presence Heals The Sick On page 4,0 , "Retrospection and Introspection,"
Mrs. Eddy r elates an incident con·cerning a woman who is in a dying conditio : "The physicians had given up the case and retired. I had stood by her side about f!Cteen minutes when the s ick woman rose from her bed, dressed h erself, and was well." Yes, says Mrs. Eddy, her presence beals disease. Let us add up the evidenoe thus far adduced: (1) Her speech heals the sick. ( 2) Her writings b eals the sick. ( 3) Her presence beals the sick. The question which we might, at this time, ask, would be, "In Mrs. Eddy's estimation, just in what way, if any, did she dltCer from the inspired writers of the New Testament?" Again, we should keep in mind that she would, without doubt, be very modest in any claims concerning herself.
The Bible and Science nnd Health "If the Bible and my work Science and FIRM FOUNDATION Health had their rightful place in schools of learning, they would r evolutionize the world by advancing the kingdom of Christ." (No and Yes, page 33) . I'! the book, Science and Health, is of any assistance in advancing the kingdom of Christ, then it must be superior to the writings of the New Testament. Yet Paul said: "I kept back nothing that was profitable."
Needless to say, Paul never mentioned Mrs.
Eddy or her writings.
Toward the end of the 19th century, Mrs. Eddy was r eceiving many ovations from students who had become successful, at least financially, by following her teachings. Many of these students addressed letters to Mrs. Eddy using the title 'Mother Mary.' Very graciously, of course, 'Mother Mary' r eplied and signed her name as she had been addressed. However, as the attack upon Mrs. Eddy and Christian Science by the prominent author and humorist, Mark Twain, grew in intensity, Mrs.
Eddy finally gave up this title and asked her followers to cease using it. However , the memory of the title still exists, inasmuch as the 'Mother's Room' Is the name given to a room in the "Mother Church" in Boston. Mrs. Eddy slept in this room only one night. In connection with the subject of Mrs. Eddy's title of 'Mother,'
we l ind her definition of the term in the glossary of Science and Health. It is this -"Mother. God; divine and eternal principle, life, truth, and love." (page 592).
Now our question is answered! Although forced to cease using the title, when she did it, she certainly had a divine meaning for it.
"Tile Fonr (?) Marys of the Bible" In Mrs. Eddy's boolc entitled "Pulpit and Press," she writes concerning a very complimentary newspaper article which appeared at the time of the dedication of the building of the "Mother Cburch" in Boston.
On page 27, in this work, a description of the magnificent windows in the structure is given : "Another gr eat window tells it's pictorial story of the four Marys-the mother of Jesus, Mary anointing the head of J esus, Mary washing the feet of J esus, Mary at the resurrection, and the woman spoken of in the Apocalypse, chapter 12, God-crowned.''
In r ecording this newspaper description in h er book, Mrs. Eddy either failed to count correctly, or she expects to Indicate that s he is the "woman" of the Book of Revelation. Let us count: (1) Mary, the mother of J esus. (2) "A woman having an a labaster box of ointment of spikenard very precious; and she brake the box, and poured it on his head" (Mark 14:3). This woman was from Bethany. It may be, that she was the same woman that a nointed Jesus' feet and wiped them with her hair. (3) The Mary who washed J esus' feet was the sister of Martha and Lazraus.
Their home was in Bethany. ( 4) The "Mary at the r esurrection" was Mary Magdalene and "the other Mary" who may have been the mother of J esus. H the woman who anointed the head of J esus was the sister of Martha, then Mrs. Eddy expected to count the "woman of the Apocalypse" as the "fourth Mary.'' How did Mrs. Eddy Tuesday, May 22, 194..5
know tha t this "woman" was named Maryt That Is, unless she meant herse lf?
In her treatment of the twelCth chapter of Revelation, she states that "the distinctive feature has special reference to the present age." (Science and Health, page 560). She further states on page 561, "The woman in the Apocalypse is the vignette, which illustrat es as man the spiritual idea of God-and God and man as the divine princiPle and divine i<]ea."
Summary of Mrs. Eddy's Concepts of HerscU (1) Her presence healed the 11ick.
Thus, her presence produced miracles.
J esus Christ had the same characteristics.
( 2) Her written and spoken words h ealed the !!ick-produced miracles. Jesus Christ possessed the same ability.
(3) She had a message, a "gospel" to bring to the "present age," as did Christ 1900 years ago. Thus, her mission was comparable to Christ, except at a later date.
( 4,) God is the Father-Chri11t is the Son-doubtless, "Mary is the Mother."
rt is not surprising, in the face of suclt evidence, that material which has appeared since h er decease, indicates tha t Mrs.
Eddy was at times partially if not completely demented-and further that 11he was addicted to morphine.
"THE CHURCH IN CORINTH" J. Harvey DJ•kcs Today we visit the church at Corinth .
This is our third trip into the ancient past to visit among the churches of Christ. The Holy Spirit has been our guide on these inspection tours. He is the anthe r of the guide book we have followed in our journeys.
Under the directions of the inspired church history in the Book of Acts we saw !he true picture of facts in the earliest history of the chur ch. Acts is the Holy Spirit's church history. l't has g uided us for a true and fair description of events.
It has directed us to see things as they really were. It has done more than this.
because it has classified the scenes it led us to view. In one class was idolatry, intolerance, darkness and sin. In the other class was the living God, the matchless Christ, the gospel of light and the church of our Lord. It is under the guidance of this same Holy- Spirit, directed by his inspired Scriptures that we now take our way into the past to visit the cllurch in Corinth. There the Spirit will show us things as they r eally were, the ~ood and the bad. The evil will be corrected 'by our infallable guide and the good w111 be earnmended by this gracious teacher. We are assured safe conduct under his &'llldlnr; word.
As we allow the Bible text to speak and carry us back to the early days of the gospel let's not think those old examples a re tlle only examples of true church work under the gospel and the Spirit. The same church could be visited today in this city and other cities near and Car. They are !he same church with the same Spirit to guide, the same worship to observe and Tuesday, May 22, 1945
the same lives to live. However, there is this difference, the original churches were patterns for the churches of all ages. Then the Holy Spirit gave immediate direction to his servants and their labors were labors of demonstration to show us what to teach, how to worship and bow to live.
Once these patterns were cut and these examples were given it could be said the blueprint was completed and demonstrated.
From then till now and to the end of time the Spirit bas completed his work of making blueprints, yet, in these very blueprints he maintains an age-lasting and ever-living guidance for those who would be guided by him.
By the blueprint patterns in the New FIRM FOUNDATION Testament the Holy Spirit today guides in the preaching of the same gospel, in the establishing of more ·congregations of the same church, In the performance of the same worship and in offering the same hope. Thus the value In these visits among the ancient churches! The Holy Spirit gives them as our pattern as they rollowed his instructions, and as they needed correction his instructions to them serve as models of corrective teaching today.
You could visit churches of Christ today and see the same church under the guidance of the same Spirit. However, the churches of today have the original churches as their pattern, so for directness we take you with us to the churches of The Peoples' New Testament \Vith Explanatory Notes By B. W. Johnson A COMPLETE COMMENTARY BOTH KING JAMES AND REVISED VERSIONS Prnetlcal ComntPnt• nnd Beh••· netereneea.
Bnrmony of Go11pels, Llat of Pnrnbles, lllnp11, llrlrnet"". C IUe11. Tnb1ra of Wel..:bta nod JllenHurea, nnd Cbronot~fenl lnformntlon l!lver~hlng needed to ennble the earnest student to nndentftll"d and tully comJirehend every portion ot the New Teatnme11t T\YO Very Fine Volume11 Our Beat Sell<lr 1054 Pngca--Jl'wo Volume-Cloth Bound VOL. I - THE GOSPELS AND ACTS VOL. II-EPISTLES AND REVELATIONS $2.60 PER VOLUME $6.00 PlllR SEl'r FIRM FOUNDATION PUBLISHING HOUSE Austin, Texas Page Three the New Testament and there we •ay together see the divine models for faith and worship and life today and always. Thtt Spirit in the beginning guided by hbs immediate inspiration. Then he committed these instructions to writing, the sameSpirit, the same instructions for the same church for ever.
'fhe introduction of the gospel ia the city of Corinth took place in the :rear H.
'l'he Spirit's account of this work ill to11nd in chapter 18 of Acts. Paul waa the preacher. Christ was his message. I11 1
Cor. 2:2. he says of his work in Corinth, "For I determined not to know a11ything among you, save Jesus Christ, and him crucified." This was the foundatio• work for the church in that city. Paul de11cribed his work in 1 Cor. 3:10 "Accordin~ te the grace of God which was given unto llle, as a wise masterbullder I laid a foundation."
I'n the next verse he declares thi11 is the only Coundation, "For other foundatio• san no man lay that which is laid, whi-a is Jesus Christ." Here is a demon11tration of gospel work in the building of a church for Christ in a new city. Under the direction of the Holy Spirit Paul preaehed Chr ist, the crucified Christ, to the C'orinthians.
This was laying the !oulldation in t hat city. The history of the story in Acts 18: 8 says, "Many of the Cor!ntltbl!s hearing believed, and were baptizea." In the preaching of Christ the foundation was laid. In believing and being ba:JtiKed the Corinthians were built upon that foundation as part of the spiritual building.
the church.
The good old gospel song says, "The church's one foundation is Jesus Clirlst her Lord. She is his new creation by water and the blood." Surely this is true.
Paul said, "Other foundation can no man lay." Christ is the foundation of his church. Peter is not the foundatio• of Christ's church. Paul is not the fou•dation of Clulst's church. Paul did •ot preach Peter, nor did he preach him11elf to the people of Corinth. He preached Christ. When Peter bad confessed Jesus to be the Christ, the Son of God Je11us replied , "And upon this rock I will build my ch u r eb; and the gates ol hell 11hall not prevail against it." Peter or Paul or any other man might be shaken, but the Carist as the Son of God Is a mighty r ock that cannot be prevailed against. This Ia tlte foundation ef the church of Christ. Otlter foundations can no man lay.
The mention of t he names of •••. as Peter and Paul, calls attention to tlte a•swer the Holy Spirit gave to the !tirlt of denominationalism in the chllrta at Corinth. In 1 Cor. 1:12 we f!•d wllere the church was divided, with some aayill~ they were' of Cephas (Peter) , others saying they were of Paul and other11 aayi•g they were of Appolos. These were •a•es or the first quality and their use (abue in this case as we shall see) sets tl•e star;e for the Holy Spirit through Paul to giTe his appraisal of the denominational !lpirit and hls answer to that Spirit and problea.
This denominational Spirit was •at ia a denomina tion; it was in the church itaell, in the church of the living God. DeumiPage.
Four FIR&I roUNDATION nations did not then e-xist. There they were, members of the body of Christ, people who had heard Ch'rist preached' as 'the crucified saviour, people who had believeil this preaching and bad been baptized into one body as you read In 1 0or. 12:13. There they were claiming 1the names of men.
This condition 1 would b ~ye passed ,unnoticed or would ,Qaye pe"n c;on~ratulateq in many a time and plac~ of this ·world, In the case in hand there is one SQecial significance, it was a beS"Wnjng case, a test case to S!'lttle the problem for all time, The monitor in thi~ case was ' tpe ~oly Spirit himself speaking through the apostle ~au! lo say, "Is Christ div;ided? was ,Paul crucified (or you? 1 Or we1·e ye baptizefl into 'th~ name of Paul?" What a time to divide over men and follow men! Their faith had originally been in the Christ.
The Holy Spirit calls them back to the fou11dation, to Chrllit. The names of m'en were not preached, they were not baptized into thes;e names, they cannot save and t·he:Y take one away from the name of Ch'rist. The case is settled. rt 'is Christ first, last and always. This was the t:ort• ect answer then for 'the Lord's church and the 'answer gi'ven toda)' bly that same loyal r~'h\trch. Wheri a mefuber steps aside from this solution he hides the glory of the name of Christ and is corrected. by the I l' J tt t \
Holy Spirit. '
l In thi.!j connection we read the Holy Spirit's solution to all party names a»d party spiri t, to all division and a ll sectarianism in verse 10, "Now I' beseech you, brethren, through the name of our Lord THE GREATER GOSPEL SONGS r . rll.
I ' H 1r ,, • B<Utea by Auatm Taylor fHa l I I ·r•r A Standara In Field of Song { ll)
'.
} 'I I The editor and compiler of this Hymn-book baa studied for many years to know what songs in the books now otrered the churches are the most singable an'd 'at th'e same time the most Scriptural. Be ' has arrived at the conclusion tha t 200 Scriptural songs comprise practically all that are popular and regularly used among the churches. Be then set about to select as nearly as possible these hymns and songs, and the result Is "THE GREATER 008·
PEL BONGB," a superb selection of 194 ot the best and most popular songs ever written or sung.
The increasingly large number or churches now using this new hymn-book, and the favorable com· ~ ~
ryent so, frequently heard or read, together with tht>
'"epellt or;ders that are reaching thls otrlce, all conllr:.
m the conclusion that lt Is Indeed a book or geu· uine merit, and prompt us to say that Satisfaction Is Guaranteed Ot~" of th(! •hest son~ lea-der-a in the brotherhood who baa used tbls book azys: ''ll ~ ttlle Tinea' aezecnon Of' htfmna ana apfr(tual tong& I have teen.··
But many others give similar -testimony. To all who need a song book there Is just one thing to do: Buy it, use tt, and pass your own judgment 88 'to lta ROrth. ,.
"Greater Gospel Songs" ls an excellent book, altogether a beautiful book oound In a flue, clear, blue cloth, attractlve In appearance, that will look weli In your 'hook holders1 and that wlll renect credit In a neat and well, kep• chur~h 1buU(Ung. '" · r > 1
I ' !I Above aJl. Its contents, we beldeve, are the very best tor church use.
l I 'f HI 1 '60· dents per copy; 1t>os1!paid; $7.00 per dozen; I J If $50.00 per hundred (not prepaid) I( ltnl) FIRM FOUNDATION PUBLISHING HOUBBI, Auetln { 1) Texaa I CT'!'P"5·.,.,.....,...........-xrm: ______ I ;#*_,...,. •. -:: ... . -·-..
...... !~
Tuesday, May 22, 1945
Jesus Christ, that ye all speak tbe same thing, and that there. be no divisions among you; but that ye be perfected together In the same mind and iu the sam'e judgment."
Tlie way to oneness is by all speaking the same t'hing. This is vossible onl:Y by our speaking what the B'ible does say. yYe will n ever tie one speaUiug wbae the B!bie does not say. LeaVing all the names, commandmehts, creeds 'and ol'ganl~ations olr 'm'en ahd sl'Jea'kitlg wha~ 'the 'ffi'bl~ saya I iS the solutioh. It can be done. I t is' betng done.
There are over 500 radip broadcasts in tbe tTnited States' this week where this. sermon c'ould be used in complete harm6ny with all their history and llUrJ)ose. ' The churches of Christ are united, tbou1gh each congregation is independent. Our one bond that makes us one is our one head, Christ. Simply by speaking the same thing we :tre of one mind and one judgment.
Simply by saying just what the Bible says •
em any subject their radio programs are interchangeable. In fact, some programs a're broadcast by more than a dozen stations.
They are speaking the' same thing and one congregation knows it can support the rebroadcast of the program delivered by a nother congregation.
The church at Corinth gives us a pattei'U for financing the work of the church.
Iu 1 Cor. 16:1,-2 Paul wrote, "Now concerning the collection for the saints, as I gave orders to the churches of Galatia, so also do ye. Upon the first day of the week let each one of you lay by him in store. as he may prosper." Not as they were taxed, nor as they were assessed, but as the Lord had prospered them they were to each give on lbe first day of the week.
This was the Lord's plan. It is the model plan, and it is ~P to each Christian to fit his giving into this plan. Consider your prosperity, count your blessings, purpose in your own heart (2 Cor. 2:7) and give.
If we will all speak this same plan, just in the very language Paul gave, we will all be of one mind and one judgment in the matter of financing the work of the church. We would be united on the happiest plan known to man, the Bible plan. The Bible plan !or everythi ng is still the best plan.
Its plan fCll' preaching J esus is tbe best plan. rts plan for refusing the names of men is the best plan. Its plan for speaking the same thing is the best plan. Read I he Bible anEl it will do you food "a$ it doeth the upright in h eart."
o--- -
WRIOlt IS 11EIDTER?
~arron E. Starnes "Jt Is !letter to go to the house of mourning than to the h,ouse of feasting :
•for t11at is -the end ot an men; and the I!ving will lay i t to h!,s heart" (Ecc. 7:2).
More t han,. five hundred years before Christ, Nebuchadnezzar boasted of a magnificent palace and city, as well as an ext• msive ·kingdom. His city contained some or the wonders of the world. It may be that it was a beautiful morning, well advan, ced toward noon when he was seen walking the terraced landscapes around his palace to view a magnificence which Tuesda:Y, ~Y ~2.,. 194& F L R )J F 0 lJ'N DATI 0 N Page Five stJ;etched beyop,d tfle ra11ge ot una ided; of Z~on. , The~ · cou ld only weep, and mourn vision. , 1 he~; dessola tions, , 1 , when a voice spoke to Nebuchadne11zar saying: "Thy kingdom is departed from thee" (Daniel 4: 31) that mourning, praying Hebrew slaves had invoked Jehovah's name, which brought these words.
,flis CitY I·'YaUs wer!l· llifty -miles in· tci•r- Jl'hese, aebillew· ca,Pti¥es• •were the priscuw.
fer el;loe, more th ~n three llundred oners: lefJ; from·J the spoils· o! J erusalem.
feet high, broad enoug)1 At· the •top for 'ten All though their 1 city ; \V'llS destroyed, and car r iages to run abreast a t full speed. flis Lhay· we11e. QaPt:d\les on account of their • ·ltangil)g _ ga~<ien:s '~~re ne¥r ',to four ~un.- sins; ci 'Qod ,jnxwrath, Ilememb,ered mercy,"
dred rijet' above l'h~ earth, laden with wav- 8l~d ol: cour~ .,the , proud !·haughty king But, like a thunder-peal from a cloudless sky these words came to the king. The years swiftly passed, Nehuchaduezzar died.
another king as h a ughty as he took the throne; but Jehovah's word was out, and it "standeth sure." "The counsel of the Lord standeth forever." (Psalm 33:2). Yet, when Belsh azzar came to the throne, he heeded not the mutterings of the coming f'torm and doom. For long, the Persian thousands swarmed the city, but apparently they battered its massive walls and ·' 1 I • r ' L f~~:. - 11 qf( ..,, ' J '' t ' Jd k · · mg S'hrups an.!f, \ree~, fro~.,whic~ s pl,ash-, ~ou . not now, neither d1d the promenading fountains sent their sparkli~~ jWil,ters uag ·JPSters, rbe!JeYe! that the mourning fToli? be'tte'ath ' g;(lY. 'dec'orP:t~ll A'rc 'e~. j },~J ·he!L!i tPr &Ild• praying lips oJb tbese. •neglectnil glanHeabw(ftil ' 9~~i~hf ~'t' thl1" ~on.~~rs • a il ' ~ct,'captives, could invoke: the: narn~r or God, alro1ind h'tin, ' be boh~tfullx ei~laim ed : "Is wl!ichJ in answen1 to tl1ei11 ·cries, a power riQt thJ~ /Neat Biitiy)on ·tl\at f. have built c,ome d_ow thtfrom heavan, and destroy, their by my' n\iglit'hnlf''rio;v~r fo~ iiie hort9 r '· of ciJy, ap,d ltl\'ke ,thein,Jk:lngqom .•, 't' ,r· thi' Mili'est ff/,1' rr 1'!, ~~"• 1 111 ''~" 1 1 J.~tt-le djd, the rkiug tb>inkl' Hctle·· d!d, the • J ,. , "' ul• ., r;J ·'"' " 11 .,L0'"1 !~ lt, ba9 , EJV~,.\ <i~¥\e to ,bis eap~ th~t, it P 1e asJJre-I ov·m g pop~t I a t1' ons 1b e.',". ave tha t ~ bAUU ~. ~o ~ t~ahoqs~1 ot~ann~RJ ~~-' ~'t~_· _,_··~~~~-'~''-"-' ~··_··-· ~''~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~ ... aii {'' i'J} :of7 \ c.;, I' :"1 • c ,J1 1Lr. vt ~ 1 -
t:B_lfYr ~<i yftJd11?WU1n o;,,.~~eMW&'1 py;, Wt<H '· l:'nde.,1f?,etn fierqre; 1 ct,es~pc~~<m. 18ftd, a, h ~ughfy si,Jiri} ~eforfl ,Fl ~fllll" ,.(~t;ov l ~:{S), 11 e1,n~d. ,Pflid a/'1 )iY,Ie.,a,t~nt~Rn tp, bot~ ·. a~ ne, hi)-~ ,fln~ ,?,tMr W9fAr ,fJi9,1j0 ~h'11 I Goq oJ h ea,~~P.: ,~rorp ,pis yiew Cjlf11i;fe and t}1e worl1d, 1nap~ht e}se P,ut an eal(tl!qulJ-k~ cou~d s~<tk,~ Bi~,,prjjtp1~~ty or-. k~pg~Ofll. "' .
, E\e, n;Qt 'tWJIYthfid. J?l¥SiV~ , ;walJSJ, !IO higl\ that. t,he poldest -m~gh~ s~~n k from even tr~ipg tp tSC!l-)e t;h~, ; tpeY. wene so tbiok thq)j lltood; ,as a11~efja,n,t:. c)lalte!fge to 1I!an., gqn,el<t l\P cJ obe- tt~r~n,g,, ri\_m. (, BesiQes, a deep channe! sU,rro,unqed .. thE} ci by, ,id l,edr with waters ~rom th!l Euphrates. fl'w~pty-J;i;ve POJtP,erous, gat-es oJ:. ,br.~S!! S\Y, ~pg from f,be four., sj d e~ 11of1 tJl EI 1 citJr. ,wal;ls,, ,with< ptrong tower~ , ~ t!!- ndh;~g b~tween Jt:hem, bidding -de.
fia,nce to all ,the art;nies. of. the ·WOl'ld. Fit:ty st,ree,ts, ejlc,h q~e pf , t4eml pne hundred fi~ty f\'lfil.~ .,wjd4il, , ~ift ~~n 1 miles , ip ;,le)Jgth, .
s tr e~ched from gate ,to gate. Within sucl;l a))! incl()JiUI'e there w,ere ,pa laces , aud i~!ll,p~ es , tpwer !!, ,llJ.\cl,at·ches wh~~ h a.<:hed1 th~ e~e wiGI! p1,a~pi;&ic~nce, de,ag~l! !!~"the, e\l(r, w~~h1 the cgn , 9 f grandelJr, rmeetipgl bot~ ate.
very ;wrn, , , 1
J3ut>r deep dawn, andf behind •all t his[ tl!e'Ue. was 1 a \litstl!YI ·dif:llerent scElll'le. t1 •BW , , the streams and fountains lfan below" hill gardens, thffr~ were ., g,t;() UPS of Heljrew dtptives. Tl1eir harns were . han ~in g i~ I f i i 8'1 I (t ' 1..
silen,Ce, on ~h1e d!'(JOPi'Nf bra nche!l,, (/f ; ne willo,ys, th<eir h earts were sad, the~r he~ds were bowed with gri~f.
• The promenaders of tl1e · wicked. city passedr by tbem on tbeir ' tow:s' of ,meJnry-.
mruking, desLing and jeering them as they passed. They• taunted the poor., neglected rapti,•es by· aslting them tq, sing some of their,nati¥,e ;songs\ 'J'he1 Hebrews. all!iwe11ed \Vith tears. In• that strange land of idolatry, and wickedness, they, could not sing their songs, beca)lse their hearts were too full I II 1!1 h- I ' ., n 1 ' I ' t r ~
1'1(1 • . l ' ' '
VI'"' ·BIBLE LECTURES 0 EACH SUNDAY - ~."IC .,.,. IIH 1 KWKR. 1130' n:c., olirevep6rt, WE ARE READY TO FILL YOUR ORDER BY NEXT MAIL Clarke's COMMEN~TARY The Origin;,~J Edition, with the Author's Final Corrections Six Beautiful and Useful Volumes !;~J 5QQ PER SET • · n•Jot ~11 llf J lclJ11 1
1 \d 1 1 , I' ••· j • .• 1< •
This is' "-'ithout doubt the greatest commentary in the world on the English Bible. It i::; in a class to itself. For questions invo'lving history,,. archeology, the variou~ translations and practical com,ments, Adam Clarke has been for many years the recognized leader in' the realm of commentaries. This is the original, final' a;nd_, unabridged edition1 in six 'vo1m;nes, four on th,e Old Testament and two on the New Testament.
Complete Bible text (King James Version), with rPferences, helps1 ·~pd , f ull a~d 1 reliable' co~e;nt$;_book, by book, -·v~rse 1by verse. The need of every honie and• library-an ideal gift for any persQn and purpose. A set to bee,u9~ft througho~t life. apd handed 'down to other .~~era}iohs W!it~ , bl\es~in~{' r~oo_~j rea.~- . l a!ble tY,PE1...llarg'Ei anti S!lear~ exce1lent pap~r, attr:af-ttve and · ·r serviceable bil:lding. Nearly 6JOOQ pages. r.- Tlie ·s1x-volume set for 1only' $15.'00. Postage' ad'~itiQnal, ,6~c. ,. rnt ",~. J,~ l r: • I i) J ~JRM FOUNDA:Tid,~ ·~uBLJSHJNG"c B~QUSE J. ,UV "I BOX 77 ~ ( ' ',~ . L l.
AUSTIN~ (1) TE~AS' Page Six F IRM F OUNDATION Tuesday, May 22, 194~
irtuea r;ates in v; in. As baffled foes, they thea aet about to sta rve the Babylonians into liUbmission. F or two years they Jsedced the city with armed forces. The t~elf-eon f id ent monar ch laugh ed them to scora, boasting that his gra na ries were "itored with provisions to last them twenty years. For Belshazza r, warriors could plot and plan, but they could not pillage his city. For Belshazzar, Jehovah's prophets ~ould prophesy, and Hebrew captives could pray, but Belshazzar said: "I will mock them all." Girdled with impregnable wa lls ~nd fo r tresses, surrounded by myri ads of ~dmiring tr oops , he affimed: " I will exalt my throne amid the stars of God."
great feast. It was not only a night, al- been bewildered with amazement. All though he had a fatal night ; it was a sea-l this was Illumina ted with lights hanging in son. His lords were summoned. His· golden candlesticks, above tables laden nobles were present. Through a ll the I with golden vessels, stolen f rom t he house s treets the multitudes cried hosannas to all of God in J er usalem .
To celebrate his self-styled honors and :security, he was ma k in ~ r eady for his ~~~~nd~ CCHRISTIAN W oRKER'S llimrn their gods. Wine flowed like water from fountains, lust paraded every secret place, revelry stalked every street in riotous abandon.
In a ma gni[icent palace, apart from t he tumultous crowds , the king was feasting a " t housand of his lords." What gorgeous scenes! Arch above a rch, column beyond column, long corridors festooned with ha ngings of costly draperies, endless profus ion of ornaments, leaping fount ains, a ll combined to form such dazzling splendors, t hat unaccustomed spectators should have C entral thciDe of the B ible is SALV ATION- the r estoration of man to t he iiDaee o f G od, lost throueh sin.
That is why chis unusual Bible is especially valuable co the Christian worker for it is marked in red on all subjects connected with the Theme of Salvation.
Important verses are interlined and lettered; verses of secondary importance are indicated by a perpendicu-!ar marginal line and lertered. l etters i ndicate the sixteen subjects on salvation which are explained in the index. In the index, a reference ro rhe firs t verse on each subject is printed and, at the end of each marked verse, is a reference ro the next verse on the same subject. This makes a chain of 3,000 marked passages which enables the student co study or read in consecutive order all passages relaring co any chosen copiG. Contents: 390 page Bible encyclopedia and concordance, 32 page reference summary, 6 page calendar for daily reading, pronu nciation guide, 16 pages of famous Leinweber full color illuscracions, 15 pages of sepia illuscrntions, 17 maps in color, explanation of che use of the center column references and of the Christian Worker's Bible markings, four page family record. Size: 5¥.1 x 81(6 inches; 1~ inches chick. 850. Genuine leather, divinity circuit, round corners, red under gold edges, headband ... $9.75
of the LoRD. ' ~~lJl! 1:& CIIAP'I'ER '[. F. 12. 1-4
9 f These are the ~erations Of Ln. ~SO 1 NoaTt, tc!lA 1114 !1:Tf~nd IIU fit#N,I Ct'Nzt:m z.
NO'ah: NO'ah was a Just man and Acts , oiG =.:=.:rw~ood. ~Jil'f;;iJ/:liJf::;~
~t:in._hisgeneratiOllS,andNO'ah '~p. AND the LoRD said unto No'ah.~ walkOO. Wlth._ God. Come 0 thou and an th house 0
lOAnd No'ah b~t three SODS, J~M;fs into the arr · for thee ve seen.
S~l i'I'Ii..~am, analsod Ju'pheth. kEzelc.'T, l! n hteous ~ ore me m enerar l ... J.m earth wasco~tbefore Amoee,2 on. O, 15 6
God, and the earth was 1illed with 1
Pot.., 7 every •clean beast thou sh8.1ti FIRM FOUNDATIO~ PUBLISHING HOUSE Austin ( 1) Texas Princes, noblemen, wives, mis tresses, arrayed in such apparel that their beauty out-da zzled the splendor s s urrounding them. They made the arches ring with their shouts and songs. The music would r ise and swell, t hen lull into dying cadences.
The king was so e lated and excited tha t he excla imed: "Bring forth the vess els of gold taken from t he Hebrew's temple in Jerusalem." The servants brought them. Marvelous vessels they were ! There they s tood on the t ables of Babylonia's king. As they were covered with sacred emblems made holy by their former dedication to God, t hey would seem t o rebuke t he ones who were r eady to profa ne them. But the king and his lords only la ugh ed. F illing them with wine, they claimed to drink confusion to the God of Isr ael. At the same time, they were praising t he gods of gold and silver , brass and s ton e. In the midst of all th eir mirth and sacr ilege, profaneness reached its highest point. J ehovah's word was out, and it cannot " return unto him void."
"It is bet ter to go to t he house of mourning, than to the house of feasting," and these people bad made a bad choice. A mys ter ious hand appeared to wr ite more mysterious words upon the wall. Terror took the place of reve lry, consternation took t he place of joy. The king was pa ler than the ma rble which surrounded him.
Untasted wine remained in the goblet, the glasses cras hed upon the tables, the king's knees smote each other, the loudest in mir th s uddenly became as s ilent as death.
The look of seduction became anxious and solemn. The dead line being set by the God of heaven, the finger pointed to the wri ting on the wa ll, the interpretation ot which might be summed up i n t hree words :
" Read t hy doom."
But, the king could not read the words, ther efore he broke the s ilent consternation by call ing his astrologers. They were as much terrified as he . Da nie l, who had won favor wi th the former Jdng was summoned.
With calm countenance; be gla nced at the words to behold the language of his native tongue. Solemnly, he r ead them to the king: "Men e, Mene. Tekel, Uphar sln."
Then, like John t he Baptist before Herod so many centu ries later , Daniel recited to the k ing the unveiling of his crimes against t he God of heaven, whose mandates he l1ad t rampled beneath h is feet. In calmness, Daniel gave the meaning : "God bath number ed thy ki ngdom and fin ished it," (ror )
thou art weighed in t he bala nces and tound wanting : thy kingdom is divided, giTen to the Medes and Pe rs ians ."
Before the king could see again the magnificence of his kingdom, consternation was turned into tumult. It was not the fa r-off, su llen sound of bur sting billows; it was n ot the tramp and shout of dru nken multitudes celebra ting the klng'11
r evelr ies; it was the battle cry ot thoucands of their en emies ; the measured tread Tue:sday, May 22, 1945
of the P e rsian army, a dvancing to their 1laughter.
The Euphra tes had been turned from its channel. Underneath the wa lls wh ere the r iver entered, then where it de parted f rom the city, the gates had not only been neglected to be shut ; but t he waters had aba t ed, giving access to a ll the power s and aecrets of Ba bylon. The Persia ns were there. "The t estimony of the Lord standeth s ur e." T he streets ran blood , like the E uphr ates r an floods. To t u rn at bay, to lllake a last effort to de fend his throne and crown ava ilEld nothing for the king.
Babylon's doom had struck, the king fell a mid his followers. Around the tables where th e golden vess els f rom the Lord's house had been pr ofaned, his noblemen lay • ying. The h an d writing upon the wall llad vanish e d, for its denouncing woe h ad !teen fulfi ll ed.
Who be lieved in those days that it were !tetter to go to the house of mou rning than to the house of feas ting ? Who believes it today? Who believed then tha t there was a stronger power in fa ith and peni tence, and prayer, than ever r esided in walled eities, a r ma ments, or defenses devised by men ? Who believes it now?
Of course we do not build walls now like t he walls surrounding Babylon. We do not ltuild pyramids like t he a ncient s, nor worship the s acred bull. We do not h a ve gods ef s tocks a nd s tone; but we build pyra mids, erect wa lls, worship idols, and strive to ma ke every day a holiday throug h a ll the year.
The world is mad for p le asure, for feasti ng, for enjoyment . It n eeds to call a halt ;
ltut it cannot be successfully done as lon g as there is so much of It present in church.
As a n a tion, America n eeds to know it; as religious people we n eed to r ea lize it.
When th e T itanic was r eady for c hristenF I R M FOUND A TION is out. Tha t he has said : " It is better to go to the house of mourning, than to the house of fea sting." T ha t while we feel so hope fu l t ha t our a llies and defenses a t home s hall s ecure to us our freedom, we should a ls o r eali ze tha t our real d efense Is not whe r e s o many believe it to be. It ia a lso decla r ed tha t : "Righte ous ness exa ltc th a n a tion" (P rov. 14 :3 4) . T en righteous would h ave saved Sodom; do we h ave that proportiona l per centage in America?
Our "Ship of State" co uld possibly have a tuted d eck like the T itanic. Is it time to s ing , "Nearer My God To Thee"?
We should learn the lines of t he poet:
' •If men car ed less for wealth and fame .
And less for ba ttle fields and glory; n wr itten in human h ear ts a name, Seemed greater th an in song or story; lf me n inst ead of nursing pr ide, Would learn to ha te and abhor it ;
If mor e r e li ed on truth to g uide, The wo r ld would be the b e tter for it ."
We should lear n to s ing wi th Mrs. Pres ton:
"It's not our armaments on ocean or on sh ore, Not f r eedom's vaunte d, proud pr etense, Nor gold's uncounted s tore; Our fa it h h ath ma de us wh at we are, Be neath these skies so broa d, From Souther n Cr oss to n orthern sta r , Our people worship God."
The mourning h earts and praying lips of righ t e ous people can call forth more power for the sa lvation of n a tions, and of souls , than have ever been written in the p hilosophies of men . "It is be tter to go to the house of mourning, t han to the h ouse of feasting: for that is the end of ing, cables flashed the news under the all men."
eceans tha t her water - tight comp artments would k eep her a floa t, no ma tter wha t h appene d. Ther e were p eople on the other "'1'00 iU UCtl 1\IONEY" side of th e Atlantic who h a d pa ss age a l- H . Lester I'nrke r ready pa id on oth er splendid vessels. But The other day I heard a conversation In for the ho nor of coming back home on this which the a bove phrase was used wit h r eflll a iden trip the Titanic was to ma ke, t hey erencc to the sala ry of a pr ea cher . The salary in q uestion, pa id by ono of the la r ger cong r ctook passage on th is, the f inest ship a float . ga tlons, was the prodig ious sum (?) of $280
The Titanic was a verita ble pa lace on t he per· month, plus a house In which to Ji ve.
ecean. ITer car go of h uman li fe was equal The preacher star ved his way th rough four to many co u nty seat towns. But t hat ves- yenrs oC college in order to prepare himself 1el was given to hila rity, worldly musi c for the high calling of gospel pr eacher. P hys and wine drinking . More pleasure, feas t- ica l a buse th en endured Impa ir ed his fu tu re ing and ban qu eting th an commerce on hea lth, nnd since lea ving school he ha s vomllllnny s hips cross ing the seas. "On with t ed blood as a r esult. F or several year s a fter ~e da nce, let j ov be unconfine d" is the finis hing ~:~c h oo l he wor ked for· ~:~ mall congr·e -
gatlons, unable to support him fully. Durunivers a l cry. lng t his time he and his good wife sold When it is t oo late, people t urn face thelt· household furnishings and th eir a utoabout.
When it was k nown the Tita nic was mobile In order to bridge the gnp between tnldng ; wh e n h er deck til t ed and cr eened, their sa lary a nd thelt· expens es. Yet he did en a s la nting deck, the band played "Near- not compla in, nor did she.
er My God To Thee." This boy's s tory Is not unlike ma ny, many For lo ng months b e for e the San Fra n- other s : sacrifice, priva tions, selC-deninl in or·der to pr each eisco dis aster , there b ad been specia l se a- the gospel. Yet, when he fina lly gets a wor k which suppor ts him fully aons of merry ma lting . The slogan was : s omeone Is heard to say, "He gets too much "l!lyes never close in ' Frisco, ey es always money!"
aee the beauties of Golden Gat e." All the The man who used t he above phrase has places of amus ement we re running d ay r etired while s t ill a fa irly young ma n, and t he a-nd night. We love Amer ica, we love our Inter est on his a ccumula ted wea lth will take eountry, we should be loya l to her flag. ca re or his Camlly In t he cuture year s. "But :aut we should realize tha t J ehovah's wor d 1 I got mine the hard way," ho snys- nnd thl' Page Seven Infer ence is all too clear tha t, In his opinIon, the preacher· "gets his" tho easy way.
Mos t preachers of the pure gospel suffer much hards hi ps t o educate themselves. Arter lea ving school they often work for years on a "shoe s tr·lng" sala ry. Then f ina lly, iC they a re lucky, t hey get a work that just about pays their way. I know of not one, thoutrh, who has been able to accumulate sufficient wealth by preaching to r etire nt !ltty, ll!\s ured of a comrortabl& llv~n g the res t or his li fe. Yet someone has the audacity to :~a y , "'l'oo Much Money!"
Wha t do you think?
Raton, New Mexico.
B uilt in Texas CHURCH FUR N IT U RE P ews-Pulpi t Furnitur e , Opera and Folding Ch airs Quotations Witho ut Obligation L. L. S A 1\1 S & S 0 N S Waco, Texns World-Wide Directory of The Churches of Christ With 1945 Supplement This New Directory of the churches of Chr lat, conta ins not only the locations o! th e churches In t he United States, but In Canada, Engmnd, Scot la nd, Australia, New Zealand, The Phil ippines, Chinn, Japan, etc., e t o.
Also churches neares t to Amer ican Army posts In America and the world.
Syst ematic lis ts of preachers or the churches of Ch·r lst-brought down to date.
Most of the data In this Directory has been ga thered by direct correspondence f rom our office a nd through n considerable period of time and a t no s m 1t ll expense. It Ia a rea lly worth while achievement.
Every congregation as well as every Individua l member should hnve n copy.
Nea rly 200 pp.
Price $1.00
J•'IR'f F OUNDATION PUDLISHIXG H OlJSE A u • tln, TexAII S:m Diego, Ca lif.
~ ,c\'l'IO ~ AL Cl'rY CHURCH OF CHRIST 24th a nd "F" Streets, National City.
If coming our way, visit us.
Specia l invitation to Service Men.
For informa tion write P. 0 . Box 775, or call (Ph one ) W·3255.
San Diego, Cullf.
San f)togo 8, Onillornia HILLCREST CHURCH E>F CHRIST 3746 6th ltvenue JOHN G. BILLS, l\llniBter Phones: St udy W ·0728 Res. T -8487
Page Eight FIRM FOUNDATION Tuesday, May 22, 1945
G. IL P. SHOW ALTER, Edltor EDITORIAL THE NEW LAW "A new contman,dment I give ttnto you, that you love one another; even as I have loved you, that ye also love one another. By this shall aU men kn;(nv that ye are my disciples, if ye have love one to another" (John 13:34, 35). Authorities say we might read "law" instead of "commandment." A new law give I unto you.
"But the end of the comnwndntent is love out of a pure heart and a good co·nscience and faith unfeigned :
from which things some have tunted aside" (1 Tim. 1:5, 6). The purpose, the aim of "the commandment."
The end of the law of Christ is purity of heart, a good conscience, an unfeigned faith, and proceeding from these love, the mainspring of power that controls the life and conduct of the children of love and of grace.
"Owe no man anything, but to love one another: for he that loveth his neighbor hath fulfilled the law.
For this thou shalt not commit adultery, thou shalt not kill, thou shalt not steal, thou shalt not covet, and 'if there be any other commandment it is summed up in this word, namely, thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself. Love worketh no ill to his neighbor: love therefore is the fulfillment of the law" (Rom. 13:8-
11).
"He that saith he is in the light and hateth his brother, is in the darkness even until now. He ihat loveth his brother abideth in the light, and there is no occasion of stumbling in him. But he that hateth his brother is in the darkness, and walketh in the darkness, and knoweth not whither he goeth, because the darkness hath blinded his eyes" ((1 John 9-11).
"And now I beseech thee, lady, not as though I wrote to thee a new commandment, but that which we heard from the beginning, that we love one another.
And this is love that we should walk after his commandments. This is the commandment, even as ye heard from the beginning, that ye should walk in it. For many deceivers are gone forth into the world" (2 John 5-7).
The religion of our Lord and Savior is distinctly a religion of love. It was conceived in love and it was inaugurated in love. The whole divine system is founded upon, supporte<;l by and maintained by loYe. The redemption of the race from the cruel thraldom of sin-what i~ called by the inspired writers the divine purpose of God-was conceived in infinite loYe, perfected through in,finite wisdom, and consummated through infinite power. The exercise of power without wisdom is lawlessness, and power and wisdom combined with tJ;JC ·.)~e-ration of forces for evil without love, bring disaster. God is infinite in all his attributes, nnci in the proper exercise of them and they all conspire for his own glory and honor and for man's tem~oral and eternal happiness.
Finite wisdom and power have produced many and great industrial, moral, financial and economic institutions.
Many of these have been founded with no provision for the exercise of philanthropy and benevolence.
They rise, flourish, and perish. They are temporal; they soon serve their day and generation, and are gone. They at·e not permanent. Great men have lived in the centuries of the past who have organized governments, and founded empires and states .
They have been leaders of brave and valiant soldiers who admired and followed them to victory and to the prizes and emoluments of conquest. And earthly goYernments have been est ablished upon force and all of the kingdoms, states and empires founded by might must be maintained by force.
But the government of Jesus Christ is different from all other governments. Of it the Savior could say to the Roman governor whom he faced for trial:
"My kingdom is not of this world." It is the stone cut out without hands, without the resort to material force, it is the house not made with hands eternal in the heavens. It vvas founded not on force, nor of fleshly material power, but it was originated in and founded on love. Napoleon Bonaparte was ambitious for power and was astute and possessed of powers and qualities for leadership. He led conquering hosts to victory and glory but when he had sated his thirst for blood and for empire, when all Europe was desolated, when pestilence stalked the land, and starvation, misery, disease and death ruled the desolations of a land of once happy homes and happy peopleswhen his star that rose so brilliantly at Austerli tz, had set forever at Waterloo, and the great conqueror was spending his few remaining days under the military constabulary that guarded him he said, Hannibal, Caesar, and Charlemagne and I haYe all founded empires. Our thrones have all crumbled, our crowns have all fallen. Today not one soldier of all France would strike for Napoleon. But eighteen centuries gone, an humble carpenter of Galilee, founded an empire on loYe, and today millions would die for the name of J esus Christ. All great thinkers have marvelled at the strength of the reign and sovereignty of Christ over the hearts and lives and characters of men.
And it is only when all of this is kept steadily in view, when the peculiar nature and character of the heavenly kingdom-the kingdom not of this worldTuesday, May 22, 1945 FIRM FOUNDATION Page Nine is kept in the mind and treasured in the heart, that the church of our Lord will command the respect, challenge the attention, and exert the God-ordained influence that heaven proposes over the lives and hearts of men and women and brings to humankind the benedictions and t he benefactions of divine grace.
Another great war-the European part of it at least-is just closing. Another fanatical aspirant to r acial superiority and world domination has gone do·wn in total eclipse, and has died in defeat, and in humiliation, shame and ignominy. The war of The German Aggression closes without one ray of hope for the ambitions of great world rulers and conquerors for any sort of permanence for nations built on greed and ruthless treatment of helpless peoples. But no human government is perfect, nor is any one of them secure against the disintegrations consequent upon the imperfections in their establishment, constitutions and - administration. But the rule of Christ in the church, the new covenant, has stood the test of the most exacting criticism, and of the fiercest and most obstinate opposition for now nearly 2,000 years, and it shines with a lustre undimmed by the lapse of time and the powerful efforts that unbelievers have made to pull down and destroy it. It originated in t he infinite philanthropy of heaven, and it is maintained and perpetuated through the unshaken and unshakable power of brotherly love.
But this love must be exercised that it may be intensified, that it may grow. To this end the apostle Paul has left on record his most earnest entreaty to the brethren in the ancient church of the ancient city of Corinth : "Let all that ye do, be done in lo,·e'' (1
Cor. 16 :14). All that is done in the service of the Master must be performed in love. No other ser vice will be acceptable at a throne of grace.
ANCHORAGE, ALASKA In November last year five members of the New Testament church began meeting in a room of the USO building in Anchorage, Alaska. We were restr icted to one worsh ip hour weekly (Sunday morning ) and endur ed several cond itions not conducive to the most satisfactory worship. We ran a weekly notice in the town newspaper , obtained a short radio announcement each Saturday night, and devoted as much tune as possible to the work. We are happy and tha nkful t hat our group now numbe rs around twenty-five, nearly each Lord:s day presenting newcomers to help carry on the work 111 thiS field that is ready for harvest.
Last month we changed our place of worship to a cityowned building being used by the Red Cross. ·we now have greater seating capacity, are h aving both worship h ours on Lords ' days, and will soon start a mid-wee!{ worship. Our new location , however , is au upstairs hall. It is q uite dirty and deteriorated and we are not permitted to renovate.
Furth er, the city Informs us that they will expect to malte use of the building some time this summer , thus presenting us wi th another serious problem for the near future.
Excess Government buildings a re now being sold periodically to the public. The church at Seward, Alaska, r ecently purchased one or these buildings and now has a wonderfully l And all this means a great part of service performed in the name of the religion of Christ will be rejected. It depends upon the way we do what we do in the service of the Master. Service th~t is performed in the Master's name must be performed as he requires. Let nothing be done through strife or vainglory, is the instruction of the h1spired apostle, but in lowliness of mind let each esteem the other as better than himself. In many congregations the1·e seems to 'be litile or no love of the brethren or love of the Lord. There is jealousy and envy and strife and discord, and backbiting, and every evil work. After all it may be better not to do what the Lord requires at all than to do it in a way that the Lord forbids.
The kingdom of Christ was founded on love. It is by far the most permanent. and powerful and influential institution the world has known or will know. Those who have been brought to the high honor of its fellowship and glory are under the gracious privilege and responsibility to show forth the excellencies of him who has called them out of darkness into his marvelous light.
The church at this time is facing a tl·emendous responsibility.
The question is, shall we meet the challenge?
The boys are coming home soon. They are returning from the horrors of mortal combat, and from the orgies of blood in a conflict not of our choosing, but thrust upon us by ambitious leaders and by peoples who have turned away from God, and from love, ~o the ill-fated alternative of force and hatred. They Wlll need our words of kindness, our compassion, sympathy and loYe. They will need, as never before, that tenderness and gentleness, that meekness, and lowliness of an unselfish service such as can be supplied '
only through an unselfish love.
neat and attractive h ouse. We believe if we did not purchase une of these buildings we would be malting a serious mist~ke.
We are 011 the al ert for a s uitable s tructure. These buildings :lie reasonable, but the cash muf!t be r eady when the opportnnil\'
presents itself. Our present estimate of needs is $ 2,000
for the building and $3,000.00 for n lot. As much r emodeling lind decorating as possibl e will be done by the brethren here.
A stron" evangelistic campaign from July to September has been pron~ised by c. B. Shropshire or Portland. expenses . for which will be borne by brethren in the states. We promised we would have a good place ready for the meeting. We Will.
but we need help from brethren and f1·iends e,·ery':': here and lwow yon wi ll not fail us. Congregations are urge~ to se~d a r egu lar contribution (there are five Lords' days Ill J~pnl) or a special contribution. Individuals are asked to send ltberal offer ings. send to: Church of Christ, Box 314, Anchorage, Alaska.
R. c. Humble, H. J . Perry, William Morse, Alfred Windha.m, Ger ald Sears, Roy ·wilson, Robert Fenn, Ralph Chnrchil~, Smith B J H Parker Lee George, Owen Crenshaw, CurtiS Johnucy, . . ' w· h son and others wi ll see that the work h ere progresses. 1t your prayers and support the church will a~complish great thing<: in this city of our great northern t erntory. - CUR'l'IS JOHNSON.
Page Ten FIRM FOUNDATION Tuesday, May 22, 1945
THE LORD'S WORK IN WINNEMUCCA, NEVADA I believe this is the first report, in quite some time, of the work here in Winnemucca, Nevada.
This is a report of the history of the church to the present time, and of our plans for the near future. I trust that many will feel the responsibility of helping to spread the gospel here in Winnemucca.
History of the Church '!'he church is only a little over a year old, the charter o1embers being: Brother and Sister George Kinney, Sister Dortha Moore, Sister Jean Johnson, and Brother Curtis Davis.
Brother Davis is a graduate of Abilene Christian College and a minister of the gospel. H~ drove nearly one hundred and seventy miles, every Sunday he could, to meet with these faithful Christians.
Tent Meeting Last summer the church in Reno, Nevada, felt the responsibility of sponsoring a mission campaign in Winnemucca.
At that time I was working with Brother Jack Nadeau, in Reno, and on August 14, 1944, Brother Nadeau brought eight of us to Winnemucca to survey the town and to do personal work. During the survey work we found three members of Christ's body who did not ltnow the other members were meeting and they immediately began worshipping together.
About a week later. Brother Alvin 0. Raney, minister of the church or Christ in Price, Texas, began a series of meetings, 11eld under a tent, which continued through three weeks.
The people of the town did not know what to thinlt as this was the first tent meeting ever held in Winnemucca. Old pioneer men would s tand around and curse us. Young boys would drive by in cars, while we were having services, r acing the car motors, while other boys would throw green apples and rocl(S against and on top of the tent. Brother Raney is to be commended for the force(nl manner in which be presented the gospel. There were no baptisms or restorations during the meeting, but many good and honest souls heard the gospel and as a result a few have obeyed.
Rcfm•u to Winncmuc<:<'l.
·while support was being arranged, my wife and I went to Roseville, California, and began work on September 25th. We returned to Winnemucca on November 25th to begin work with the faithful Christians.
The Culberson Heights church of Christ in Oklahoma C'ity, Oklahoma, is sending us $50.00 a month, and the church l!ere began paying us $25.00 a month January 1st. ·we have recei,·ed donations from various ones and are very appreciative and thankful for their help and interest. I will continue parttime wot'lt with Brother Kinney at the Railway Express Office, and my wife will continue part time work as a stenographer until enough support can be arranged.
In the past two and one-half mouths we have had three conversions. Brother Davis' wife was converted from the Baptist doctrine; Sister Margaret Dodgson was baptized into the body of Christ; and Brother Gene Miller was converted from the Presbyterian faith. Brother Mlller is a descendant of Alexander Campbell and Sir Walter Scott.
At the present time we have a total of twelve members, tn spite of the fact that· a few have moved away. We have eight children attending Bible Class each Sunday.
Our Future Plans We are in need of a building here. In fact, we are not going to grow very much until we do get one. If you will note, the church of Christ does not own even a single house in the State o! Nevada. For the past four months we have been meeting in a rented ball, which is the best we can do at the present time.
Below is a list of the people who have contributed to our building fund and the amount contributed. We are hoping to have a building completed by August 1, 1945, in order to carry out the work planned. The cost of the building has been estimated at $5,000.
Brother and Sister George Kinney donated a lot valued at $400.00.
Initial church offering --------------------------$ 26.40
Brother and Sister George Kinney, Winnemucca, NeT. 100.00
Brother and Sister Curtis Davis, McDermott, Nev. ____ 50.00
Sister Cora Baker, Loan Oak, Texas -------------Brother E. Gillilland, Lubbock, Texas -----------Sister Cbarlcie Chambers, Eastland, Texas -------Church of Christ, Crosbyton, Texas -------------Brother Delbert Mathews, Olney, Texas ------------
Church of Christ, Drumright, Oklahoma McAdoo church of Christ, McAdoo, Texas ---------Church of Christ, Lampasas, Texas -------------Church ot Christ, Riverside, California -----------Church of Christ, Waco, Texas - ------------ - - --Church of Christ, Houston, Texas - --------------Church of Christ, Hereford, Texas ----- ----------Sister Charlcie Chambers, Eastland, Texas ----------
5.00
25.00
3.00
50.00
25.00
20.00
15.00
10.00
10.00
15.00
50.00
25.00
10.00
Brother A. H. Ford, Berkley, Michigan____________ 25.00
Cburcb of Christ, Flatrock, Michigan -------------- 100.00
Strathmore church of Christ, Detroit, Michigan ____ Bristol Road church of Christ, Flint, Michigan -----Sister Susan McLean, Los Angeles, California -------Brother and Sister G. Patterson, Salt Lake City, Utah Brother and Sister S. Huddleston, Salt Lake City, Utah 25.00
25.00
10.00
2.00
8.00
Total Building Fund ---------------- $634.48
Signed- ROYCE A. BLACKBURN, Minister.
ROCKINGHAM BUILDING FUND In recent months the small group of Christians in Rockingham, North Carolina, bas been making an effort to raise enough money to build a small, but attractive and comfortable house in which to worship. The estimated cost of this building is between $2,500 and $3,000. The local members have made many sacrifices in order to put a building here, but they are going to need assistance from other Christians.
At present the Rockingham church has $1,500 on hand for the building, and the members would like very much to be able to start on the building soon after the first of the year.
Consider Our Need Those who have had a great deal of experience in working in hard places say that North Carolina is one of our most difficult fields. Meetings have been held in this state, but in many cases no one stayed to follow through on the work.
The r ented hall where we meet for worship, the only available place in town, is very inadequate. It is directly over a pool-room, and in a bad part of town.
Do You Feel Responsible For Tllis Work?
There are some congregations who are in favor o! doing mi:>sion work only in their own state. All Christians should remember that if the Christians before us bad had this attitude the gospel message would not have been taught in states where it is now well established. In !act, the restoration movement in the United States had its beginning, largely, in North Carolina and surrounding states. As the population moved west, many of the converts to New Testament Christianity left the state and established congregations in the states to which they moved. Will you not shoulder some ...
Tuesday, May 22, 1945 FIRM FOUNDATION Page Eleven of the responsibility of again establishing the church of Christ in this state? One well established congregation will spread out into surrounding territory and establish other congregations.
Further Information It you should desire further information concerning this work we will be glad to furnish it upon r equest. All contributions will be acknowledged immediately, and the total amount which we receive for this building will be announced In the papers of the brotherhood. Checks should be made to Chu•rch of Christ ~uilding Fund. Letters and contributions may be addressed to me, Box 27, Rockingham, North Carolina.-VIRG lL BENTLEY.
Below is a letter from George S. Benson, who has held two tent meetings in Rockingham, expressing his belief that the Christians In Rockingham are worthy of help.
Dear Brethren: In June, 1943, I agreed to give my time for a tent meeting in Rockingham, North Carolina, where about sLx or seven.
Christians were meeting regularly for worship on the first day of the week. A group of Harding College students worked two weeks before the meeting started, without pay, going from house to house, inviting people to attend the meeting. The meeting was well attended, and it r esulted in two being baptized and a few being restored. It was decided before the meeting was over, du~ to the general interest manifested, that it would be well to follow up this worlt, and VIrgil Bentley, who had directed the personal work before the meeting, agr eed to stay. His efforts continued throughout the year.
Then in June of this year I gave my time in another meeting In which there were five additions. The work has continued to grow until at present there are more than twenty members meeting in Rockingham, and the congregation has paid for a location on which to erect a building. This group of Christians Is asking for h elp from the brotherhood to build a modest, but comfortable meeting house in which they can meet to worship and teach the gospel of Christ.
It was and is yet my firm belief that the East Coast is one of the most difficult fields to establish congregations. It is a much neglected field. I want to state that the individual or congregation who contributes to th~ work will be helping a worthy and loyal group of Christians. Rockingham is a good town in one of the thirteen original colonies. The church is seriously handicapped in its present meeting place, which Is a small hall, badly located, with barely seating space for those now attending, and with no possibilities for growth.
I sincerely hope that you will consider Brother Bentley's Jetter in which he asks for help in such a needy field. Certainly your money wlll be going to a good cause in helping to put another church building in North Carolina.-GEORGE S. BENSON, President, Harding College, Searcy, Arkansas.
PREACHERS NEEDED FOR NORTHWEST The Cleburne, Texas, church has for several years been interested In various mission opportunities in the Northwest.
Within r ecent months several changes have taken place leaving us in need of some men whose zeal for the spreading of the truth wou ld cause them to make the sacrifices necessary for the spread of the gospel in destitute places. The elders of this congregation. are desirous of communicating with any brother who would be interested in going to Colorado, Montana, or Idaho, or any other section of the Northwest.
Naturally, men of experience, sound judgment, and sound faith are the men for this work. H you know of someone fitted for this type work, or if you yourself could go, p-lease contact the elders of the Central church of Christ, Cleburne, Texas.-REUEL LEMMONS.
MY LEAVING ROCKINGHAM After almost two years' work in North Carolina I am leaving Rockingham to go to Flushing, Long Island, where a new congregation is to be star ted.
The work in this f ield has been difficult, but association with the faithful Christiltns here has made it pleasant and profitable. I came ltere to meet an emergency, and therefore my work with this congregation was to be temporary.
There was an opportunity to do good, a preacher was needed immediately, so I planned to stay here for approximately one year. However, the conditions were such that I could not turn loose at the end of the year, so I remained for the second year's work. Plans that I made before coming to Rockingham must now be carried out, which makes my leaving neces;;
ary.
The work in Rockingham has not been finished, but much headway has been made. A lot costing approximately $700
has been bought and paid for, and enough money has been raised to enable us to erect a small, modest building for worship.
The memb~rship has increased steadily. The members of the congregation have grown spiritually.
Plans are being made for the work in Rockingham to continue, and it is hoped that the congregation will have access to its new building by fall. Efforts are being made now to secure a man for this work.
In accepting the work iu New Yorlt City I realize that it will be the greatest challenge of my life. A thorough program has bE<en outlined for the Flushing work. Preliminary work has &.!ready begun. I ask that the prayers of the saints everywhere be for me and all the Christians who will have a part in t hat work.
---------01---------
WEEKLY ACTIVITIES OF THE CHURCH IN PARIS April 13, 1945
Tracts in English, to correspond to the French ones, and placards advertising our meetings were received from the printer on Saturday, April 7th. These tracts are being sent, together with ones in French, to other boys in France.
Grady Gulley (from Del Rio, Texas) reports that he and another have communion at their outfit. Parents and friends of fellows over here would do well to note this in case anyone is, or will be in Grady's vicinity, 79th Field Hospital, APO 562.
Our attendance went over the 20 mark on April 8th, Lord's day, nineteen members and five visitors being present. A couple of old members were back with us again, a mutually pleasant occasion. Lt. Morris, brother to one of those meeting in Relms, was present for the first time. R. D. Rawlings was in charge and gave the evening's lesson.
Usual contribution was sent to the London church during the week, as well as money to Brother R. A. Hill, for "Christian News" expenses.
On Tuesday a couple of the fellows paid a visit to "Stars and Stripes" office, in regards to getting our service listed in the Sunday edition, iu the weekly religious listing. No promise was forthcoming at the time, but chances are that our notice will get the listing. This will mean a lot, because then a ll "our" boys over the continent will know that they can find a place to worship in Paris, if they happen to be fortunate enough to come here on pa·ss or business. New brethren are almost constantly being located even here in the city.
On Wednesday seven were present for Bible study. Our Sunday evening service is st!Jl h eld at 27 Rue Saint Guillaume, 7:30 P.M. Mason Pepper (Athens, Alabama) reporta that he and others continue to "break bread" when. humanly possible, somewhere in Germany.-In Christian love-JAMElS W.
DANIEL, Paris, France.
Pa~e Twelve FIRM FOUNDATION Tuesday, .May 22, 1945
*FROM TJfE HARVEST FIELD * Durwood Boggs, Beeville, Texas, A'priL 30:
''During the first twenty days of April w~ baptized two and r estorea one t-o duty."
})avid ll. Owens contln~es his work In, '/{erituciCy and Illi nois. l!le plans to h old a meetIng In :Wldot!ado, Illlnols, beginning June· 1s:
~IGolm /J... Sm,lth, Oro~sbeclt, T exas, Apl'il 26: "Two fine youpg men ltf,ad~ the goo~- epJ;l!
esslon Sunday morning, and were bar,tlze d .
Into (;hrlt~t Itt rho night servll'es.'' ' 1 1
'
Any person !mowing the whereabouts o£'
r. D. Tip ton Is requested to comm uni cat~<
•with r. N. Port'er, Route 4, Lu~kln, Texas.
Ancll Young, Keyes, Oklahoma, April• 20:
'"1\'fl qr~, If) , ueed ?( j\ sound gospel preacher· for full time work. Those Interested, write lhe c!lurch ot Oh r'l~l. 'Box :!43, 'K:eyes, Oklahoma."
A. H. Bry¥t, Bo~ 64, Newkirk, Ok!Jahoma, .<;:ornellu~ c. Abbott, Chlcll:asp~ Okl~honiWt Aprll 30: "Those. who atle especially <Inter- April 30: ''Yest!)rday was anolher,. n ne day este{! 'hi the work recently started 1\t New- In the !Jor li's wdrk! h e re wflh tour respondid'rlt' will be 1
glad to know that Yj!Sterd'\Y lng td tthe lnvlta tlon. During< t he• mor!th!<
\\'a/5. our beSt dny, with fifty present' at (he of ~Iareh and April Ullrty-!our w~re. · addoa "' '.morfllng sen ·lce." to. the !Logan Buchanan, Orand •Pra irie, ,e>las. churc,h.., 'Wr· e ba d JO,"..',". _r ecord B' 'bl .-..~.
"The meotlnl:" wtt h tll e W 0 Ie h ""'"~-ee t con""''r e - c., A. Norrea· , 5722 Ken}vood Ayenlle, ~- s tudy attendance yesterday with 325." 1
1 • ' •'
gallon In Denton, T 41xas, was 0, pJea~apt, one. cago 37, Illinois, May 1: "The ( lrs,·t Lord's 1
' E'lvio "ost, •S(IIIderson. 'T e::tas. May t.: "Out· My father, c. A. Bucbnnan, Is the minister. 1 1 b ~ h h c i- ""
Two were baptized a nd one was restored." day In Apr 1 I began a ors w t t e 0
.- me@tlng was held Aprlll ~p 11•, 'fcsll,e ll11ckii:J'•
I' I « r nell Av,enue c)lu;ch o! this cit~. 1 am led doing the preach ing. The lm.~edtate, l;esuHrt1o believe tha~ thls work will be pleasant were two restorations. The church has agreed IJ!llbei'L· R. Garrct:~on, Box · 4!tll, Rose-v\ne, and profitabl e. ld release me •for as , much as 'elglftl weeks California, MaY 7: "BroLhel1 Jas. 0. ·wuburn of w o,rk away J'pom no.me In 1945. I ;Prefer Is to condu«t <?U r Junq 1DCetl,ng wh~ch lltl,lr~. V>m. J. " 'haley, T erre Hnote, Indiana, May to put thla time In slng-lng-eitber song drill~ on the lOth. Our )'Urtl 1ottage Bible ela.~s~s 8: "Slnce last ~~~mort, a Sgt. and his wife or conducting singing In meetings. Write, If have attracted a number ot !Merested o\1~- h'\\'e. ma<;Je J:Onfesslon a nd been l;mptlzed, Qur Siders. A Indy In h e r thi-rties obeyed thl! gos- attendance conpnues t o fill our h,ouse on ; ln~erested."
pel here April 29." lArd's dn'y mornings. Our W'ednes'day night ·Ma nue l B 1
IJartley, 1 t09 \V. VInita, Sulphur, service& d re being devoto!d t l> a r everem I I d ('lydo E. ftUcy, 50.1 E, BJ·oa<lway, Anadark~.
Oldahoma, April 30: "Yesterday was a gre·at day cor us. Three young people contessed riilth In Jes us Chtlst a n·d >ve rt~ liaptlz~!d. W eht to HJnton ln r t he afternoon a_nd preached to a !ull }}0\1/ie, We, ar~ ,t~ylng ;to k!41!!P busy In the Lord' ~ wo,rk.)' , 1
!J I u ' I II Elmer A. L'Roy, .1'. b. Box 63, Cooper, Tex· as, April 25: "Our work here progrc~ses nicely. '\Vc a re able to see some Improvement in several waya. ~rhere bas been sev eral people a dded to our working force by baptism and membership s ince the firs t or the :!!ear. \Yis hingo you much l;ucces>~ In your wo~k .''
J ohn H. Banister, Oklahom<t City. 01<\ah nma. Mny 7: "Onr spring meeting a t Culb e rtson Heights, In whll:h 1 did the prea<'hlng, was held from l Aprll 1 to• 8th. Thtte'd wove baptl~ cd, six l)lrtced ttlembersMJ)t ond one Wa,!j re,'jt<'lt·ed1 Jj>ur.!n,;r , ~he ! ~'!~ . t>l}r·e~ weel<s we have had four baptized, three restored, and c lf?ht to place membership. From AJJrll bt'il 'to' Mny a1·d 1 a'ssl!ited the clhtrcn Ln Stlllwa~or, Olcolah'orna, in a meetlhg whlchl resulted In eight baptisms and one restored.
Thomas l~. Scott Is the mlnll:llllr o( this good '"hurch. I enjoyed the meeting \'Cry much . 1 will be here in CUlbertson H eights during 'Ia~- and will be In BartlclS\'Ille, Ok'laboma, .May SO to June 10, and at Central chur ch In Mul!kogee, Oklahoma, June l3tb to 24th."
·l'ltudY or the ,book or Ephcslllog. :\!any o!n- Q)cl,ahOf9i\. l\1:\y ~.: "L II.;t week c ose ••
meeting In Wynnewpod, . OkJahoma. 0. R ..
pouragjng features of our •work here." l'>~~i<ln s Is <lolng tt (Inc wd ri< th er e. l-Iy n ~xt I ~1ectlng· ,~dll be In Oahadlan, T exds,' llfay 18, 9~ ta. J,ohns,qn, Seymour, 'l't>xaH, l\la;y ,1~ 1\\'•Lth H c'st<lr Dodso'n o! 'IIwltbl, TGJxaB, doing "¥rotber A. 0, Colley has ju s ~ c l?!>ed a,n, Ule, s~ng~ng; ~und!\Y was Q~'i best <l~y he1je efghl day meetlnp: ,ror thq chur?h , h ere. The ;>I nee I have bee~ h .::rc HO f~ as, atlendane;e a t tle ndrtrice ana Interest We1·e rt'rle. T h el'e was concerned."
worD C-lve baptisms nncJ, four t·est orntlons. J ' 1
preached to"· go~Jd c rowd aL aucba~an &tr~Jet Lut)ler G. S!l-vnge, BI7X ~37, ,l)lcaldton, Okln \VIchlta Falls on the fifth Sund>\y. That Is lahorqa, ~ay 6: "Last Sunday another wa'i Brother Colley's home congregation. I filled baptized Into Christ. T omorrow, Sunday, lh ror htm there." May 6th, marks the beginning of our firs t :\!. E. Blake, Bpx 305, Cleburne, Texas, April 30: "L'Ist L ord's day, April !19th, w~ l'pJTlple t!:
d our first yea~ with the congrega,tion on Llte Elas t Side In Cleburne. During lhe year we had fifty-seYen addlllon~<. The work Is going we~l both ,sph·ltually and oth erwise. -A new llieel:lng hou!lt' ill under constroctlon and W'e h o pe to h'l' n\e<:llng hJ It by ~he ~~~d ot June."
•'
,\lPlvln L. Vn,ugl\an, 723 FJ. Serrdnole, M~ -
A lcster1 Oldah?ll\a, May 8: "'l.'he montrh dt Apdl has given an lndlcn,tlon o£ g reat. en,.
thu ~ i a'sm hncl nctlvlly on the part of the membership or th~· congr egation at Second nnd Wa.;bington. Dut·lng the month there were three baJ.>ll.sms an\1 two r·e:<lorntions with three more new Bible school record~ reached.
Sunday there \Vas one baptized and one reslnJ ·atlon. ·w e are grateful !or the blessings ~f 1 he lord.''
gospel me&tlng for the year . Brother 'Basil 'D. Shilling £rom the Unl\·er slty congr ega(lon ~~ Austin, T ~xal!, will do the Preachlnj;' durIng thts meeting anti Brother W oodrow Qlandler from Green vflle. Texas, will lead th•·
songs~ "'e are looklrig forward to ha'<'ing an enJoyable and successful gospel ei!orL''
Jj;lnrer S. I}urne tt, ;Bo~ , 124, Guyman1, Oklalt 9 mjl1 "1111 7; "Th~ work '~lth the church In Guyman Is moving o~ w ith a s teady attt'ndaht: e, 'nlso Itt Gl:iddwell •tind Texhoma. r •PI·cach at O:oodwoll on tho · third Sunday :lt 3 :00 p.m. lln~l l~l II'o'Xhoma qt a100 p.m. fl'n t he se.~on<l a,nd rout·th EjqpcL.·ty!l. l. am Jn:eachlog three timfls on a ll excePt the first Sunday.
Our county sing ing o f the chur ches of ChriSt in 'l'<>xa~< l'llnn ty m<-.ts on ~ h e fiTst Sunday at 3 :OJ) p.m. It Is well nttended and the Intere!<
t In !<lng lfll!;' Is bet,ter by it. I h~ve tim" f or some meetings this summ!lr. 1 would b o: g-lad to do the p reaching for you In fhe next r e\'l\'al meeting you ha\'e.''
(;. V. P;)tll~rew, \\'Inert, TexaH, :\[a)· 5: K \\'. Sto,·all, Box S l, :\lt. l'leasant, Te x- J see many good r llports rrotn other places, as May ;;: · "1;\'ork he re Ill lnterestlng and L utnet: G. Sa,·agc, Bol: 237, Healdton, Okall of which mal(es us happy to know the thCl'e Is a 1ot to Uc done. \Ye nrc helping la homa, llray 7: "YesteJ·d.'ly Brother Basil D.
good work goes on. Our little congregation· the rural congrcgallon!l. So,·eral 0( t he morn- Shilling preaQho{l the Clrst day In ,our gos<'
Ontlnues to grow. ~e have ha,d 52 aqdi- bors. h elp at the:fo points. \Ve hav~ several pel meellnn- here In :a:enldtpn. Four answcrtiou" In the pas t 1 ~ month s, 19 In March. Our acceJHnble preachers In the congregation and ed the In vitation this tjrst day. Two wexo congregation Is >~mall h e re but every one they are doing a lot of Cine work. Last Lor d's bapt ized nnd two confessed unfaithfulness.
f1lled with Cht'istian love ana overflowh1g tlay "'a"' a fine one here. tre had a full ·tre have been ftd,·crtio<lng and looking forwith zeal. \Vo havo outgrown our house and b ouse f .,. tho morning Rcrvlce a ncl almost as ward to thla meclllng lfor several ' months.
mullt m:t lte a rrangements ror new and l?&~ter mf1ny ~91' nig ht,. TJHn·e were. ~wo t·0sponse~> · Brotlter ~hllllnS' Is now wo r k,lng wit~ ~
meeting <Jt,mrter>~. Our oCflcers are working q;· ~ljlc t~ th/) Invitation. 9ne young married Un i vcr~;lty congregation of the church o( on th is that we may have mor·e r oom, al!!ci Indy placed hQr membe r ship and an e lderly Chr(s t In Austin. ln Umes ·past \c has done better c lass rooms. Our mldweelt service Is lady, e ighty years young, 1\'ho <.'!line olit of l'I£>V~ral )'cal'!t l ol':ll ·worlt' here at· Heald toll gro,vlnS" ond C\'ery erne g<t~tlng lliLieh I':<Jod ~~J} IY y ea:rs ·o.<crvfce In lite C'hrlstlan Churoh, -The pcoJr lc in H ealdton an'l the sorrountHn~r from the "tuf)y. Bqlther Roy H. L~}'\ler 11 ~ - . c~mft:"~ied ll,et ~f,W,ta and to Q I~; )1er s~nnd W\th ' (!o,un~r·:'i U!l.\'C lt)lll'\l<'d to love and rllSP(}ftl him.
gins a incellnc; with us June 2.!lth, goln..; the <;hurc~. It ~akes courage Cor one that w·!l were g)ncl. th{\ t he coulcl sp~re t~me to through Yuly 8th. H you are n ear us or cnn ol<l to do what she did. I have n good sixteen r eturn and be with u:; 'cor a meeting. Brother be nt tbnt tlh1f' you are iinitccl. liI~ty· tho Lot•ll J'la l'!!' tr~tct juM off the pre~... A rc~raduc-' Woollro# Ch:lndler n·om Crec~vlll~. Texas.
bles>< c\•cry Christian worker e\·erywh£tTe I" t ion or nlY ar~1dlu In Oo~p<!l Advocate. •pp. is the song dlruotor tor this meeting and h r our praye r. T'ray for us In the work h e r e," H)90, l91.0, N• v~n)bqr 11.'' Is doing n spl~> >Wiu job.''
~.
Tuesday, May 22, 1945
I ~~ I M. Norve l Young has conc luded a. ts uccess~ ful meeting ih Detroit, Michigan. Brother Young Is the minister of the Broadway church In Lubbock, Texas.
Ben 'Ve~<t, Geor get'owit, Texas, May 3 :
"Brother Colley preached the gospel vigorously •In (IUr meeting. ' Eleven were ba ptized• and one lly stat ement." ...
I '
Grover A. Davis, 303 N. E. 16th Streett, Okla homa City, Oklahoma., Is available for full time work as a minister of the gospel. If Inter est ed, communicate with Brother Davis at once.
Murray M. Marshall, Box 192, Groom, fl'ex: i.::~, M11y 7: "Work continues here In Groom.
Bt·othor J1esae Powell will hold our meeting tHe Ia!rl. •h air of fOctoller. Keep this hi mind.
We l otllt fot·ward to this meeting with thi$ fine preach er." ·
J. R. 'e:tcks, Box 782, Littlefield, Texas, Ap;ll 25: "9ur m(letlng with G. I<. Wallac~ closed April 22, with t en baptisms. The church Invited Brother Wallace to return for an!)ther meeting during the summer of 1946."
WI\\ M. Tho~pson 1 24.36 Harvey Avenue, Fresno, Ca\iCorm~a. M,ay 3: ''Closed ,ten days' meeling at WoodvilJe church ncar ;rulare Jas t night. F011r baptif!ms, three r estorations.
Fine g r oup there. A new church buildlqg will >iOOn be under construction there. Corl'CSIIOndent!
l pijlase po~e ,mY ~ll"( address."
FIRM FOUNDATION H:vrry .!!:. J ohnson Is the tu lthrul and agg r essive minis te r ot the new congr egat'lo'n of dll!Ciples In Proto, 'Utah.
Sis ter C. D. Record o'f Lees burg, Texas , Is deeptyl grateful to the brotherhood tor the h elp a nd encouragement given during the llh gerlng Illness and d eath of Brother 'Reco rd. 1
'Elt\1'1 Arnold, Box 847, Bo'zeman, Montana:
"'l'he «'Ork here has g'ood pros pects a nd r see no r ea 11on why it should n ot make progress.
There are sever a l who are attending the sen·lces that seem very much Interested."
' John L. Norris, Rdute 2, Gllldewnter , Texas, i\!ay G: "Broth er THeo ~. Kirlcland and r r eceritly closeci a mission me c~ lng at Buffalo'
'l'6'xua. r Sevc·n Uaptized 'NOd tll' b' '1ftacdd' mem!
b etshiJJ. Three were baptized h et· e · r ecently.
Crowds h'llvc beeii t'he largcs't e ve r ." · '
To'm Walker, 1'135 Hollywood, Dallas, T exas, 1\tay 3: ''The meet'ing In Mountain View, Oklahoma, closeci "·lth tour baptized. C. L Taylor, one ot our best preachers, Is doing a fine work there. I promised to r eturn In April, 1946, Cor my third meeting. I am now In Canton, Texas , with good Inte r est ."
Franlt Dt·iver, 1001 East K Street, Grants Pas,., Ot·egon: "Our f<J?rlng n;te ctlng with Albert Smith oli Corvallll;, Orego;n, preach ing, c losed, Ma r ch 18. One was bapllze<L alld o~e r eM tored. The congregation carries three fiftrcn minute r adio b roadcasts each wee!<."
Page Thirteen A. R! Hblton, 'Nash vlllo, Tennessee, May 9:
"One baptism and o'ne t or mefnbershlp at €entra l cfUrch Sm'lday, May 6."
Walter E. Bankes has concluded his minIstry: with tlie church at Prescott, Arizona, and 1
1s now" preacht n'g for the Washington Street congregatlon in Falrtnont, West VIrg in ia.
John Ric\hardson, J6hnson, Arkansas: 1 "Our meeting closed May 2. One man was restored.
Tillman 'B. Pope df Alma, Arkansas, uld the preaching. Brethren Crom Fayetteville " ·ere good to attend. The church waa grllatly h elped by the good preaching."
D. e. Wllliams, Box 828, Allee, Texas, May 7: ''Meeting at Mirando City camb to a close hti!t: 'nig ht. Three werb · 'baptl:r.'ed and, t'vi:>
' I I • <> > I I plnbed' me~iibersnlp ·with the conl?•·eg:atlon. I Un\ to 'return -fdr a I two WCCkS meeting begir\ nlng the second Sunday or JUne. I ._;,.111
begll\ at Mason the 13th ~r this month."
Hugh G. Murray, Bonham, Texas, May 3:
"Since last r eport, one has peen res tored. I am s till working with the small congregations In this area. Gus Farmer Is a fine co-worker. He preaches !or the church here.
I have time !or meetings In July and August.
Alst~, I would consider full time local wor k."
Burton Cottman, Houston, ·T exas, May 7:
''There have bJlen two to s ix additions to the chu•·ch every Lord's day during 1945 thus Car at Central church or Christ. -Ther e w ere four yeis terda.-y;" thrQe tOr mem~ershlp a nd one tor res toration. I am In my eighth year with Cline B. Dralte, 54 20 Gregg Street, Dallas, this church ."
T exas, Ma.,y 8: "April was a good ,month for tho Owen wood congr egation. T h ere were sixteen responses to the lnvllatlon, t·leYen ot th em for baptism. I also conduc ted a meeting at :\lesquite, Texas, during April \lhlch ret<ulted in three baptisms and two rC I'toratlo ns . 1 ha\•e some time to h old meetings after July t.''
Price Bankhead, Swenson, T exas : "On the fo UI·th L ord's day In April three Camllles from the Chris tian Church In Aspermont1 Texa~, came to t he church of Christ In Swenson. 1 Curtis Carrlp, 315 Fairmont, Amarillo, T ex.
The second 1 a nd third Sundays In August 1 M, ~fay 7: ".Meeti·ng at' El Reno, Okla'homa., will assist In a mission meeting at Dry c losed on April 29th with two baptisms and L:l ke, near Spur, T exas. I could ass ist in two restora tlons. One of the restorations one or two other meetings." was a fine lady from the Christian Church.
K L. Hubbert, Fayettt>, Alabama, May 8:
"i t>reached Satu rday night and Sunday last at Tldl\'ell's Ch<j-t>e i. to t\~O ex~ra lar&'e crowds.
One :~a il or's wife was baptized Into Christ Sunday evening. The p eople thotc h 1lVe a m ind to worlf. }3rpthren the 'swo•·d' s till cuts.
L~l's tl~o tl wHil1e we1 ha ve llnle at!d oppor -
1 unity:"
A. L. II .. t:·~!li, C: i:1ton, O:dahonul, ~.{;.~y ';" :
"One man was baptized h ere yesterday. I recently assisted in a gospel meeting at CorHOyt H. Houchen, sno7 Ctint!lloupe Avenue, d e ll but without v isible r ellults. lily work Vap Nu)·s, tallfornla, May 2 : · "I 'have juljt In Clinton will c lose on Juno lQ, a nd after l 1 atio~1l ~hrec months in go:we'i meetings, 1 am C'. C. Jones, 2000 S. Central, Oklahoma City, Uklaholita, May 5: "l have jus t finis hed an ., njoyable mee ting with the Southwest 'congregation here in the city. Also my time with the ~9t h ;and Byers" chur'ch lhas be'en !ulflllcd an'd 'l expect to be In meeting work f llt' the rest of• the summer. One 1\undrcid alld thirteen have responded to t'he go!lpei lnYitntion here In the pasf yl!ar.''
One of those baptized was a Lutheran and the othe'r a Ba ptist. ' I am to begin a meeting tonlr;ht at Highland, about 20 miles west of A on~rmv."
J. Nf.. GiUpatrlclt. Dox 966, T1.1cumcarl, New: Mex ico, May 8 : ' 11·'Re6e1'11tly 't ? lei the p r eachIng in a gospel mce tllll:' at Ullion Center, Oklahom11,. R uin and muroPf! ,h\nsJcred f;O~IJ but w e had a good meeting aqyway. T-wo Cinll young people were ba ptized Into Christ.
Brother W. H . Farris led the singing in a.
commenda ble way. The L ord willln!;, + am to preach In a meeting at K ermit, Texas, heglnniJ1g J1,1ne ~· Our w(jlrlt hcrq f\l hqme continues s;oqd.'(
concluded my par In a very lnteres~lng meet- to \Vorl< \ ,•ith'' a rtew con g r llgallori ·whose' In/; at Fuller ton. }\•our were baptized and otie , 11 was r estored. •'-w" eld dn ~· Bennet•t 1s t h 'e' m 1n - , building Is now under construction at the ,V, T. Hines, Box 164.. Ct·osbyton, 'l,'exas, lstbr there. l'Ie i s. zealous and hard ·work- corner, Of. ~lgP>tq aJld ,Le~ &t;e~t1j, In La¥'-) rfay '1.! •·~tnce my lit'~f r bpQrt, the)"e hall lng. He re at T yr'6ne and CalVert durin~ ton, Oklahoma." been s ixteen added to the local congregation, Ap. rll, there wer e lwo b'aptlsms, tbur hans - "' 1 c:•- B "0' p ,, 1 l"' t •·v . · .,_~ O ~ .... ...,~pC"J• ) fU' -., ~ '> 1\>'UCfa l, .,.fi!n \lC,.._, 'a'r ht'x 0 •• +'-h;' es"r-' wArA b:tptlzed at our laat m eet- "< T T ,-- f~l' of meml)er shlps, and o ne r llstoratlon. H. May 7: "Six w ere baptized In our meeting lng jus t closed. Brother D. Lee. Eluk,e~ dld :;or. Harrhmin' ot Ontario b.~glns a me~tlng here w ith Hoy K Cogdill o( Hous ton, T exas, the preaching. We had one or our bes t meet-
! h ' Y i ~tl '' 1 w ~h u~ ere · •a( ~ l. • ,_ I I• prellching 1nn<l '0laud H!'Woodrutt· of Sbelbyr •JngSJ 1Ln splte. Jofi. our ,one in Y v'·w~"• e B a"., tl s l)
, 1 , , , , ,1 1, ville, Tenne>:!see, directing songR. Th c~e men who s tarted t he s:une tla& ~YOI did. l am 'f,IIJI491 'I;I)omps\)n. JIous,~on,, Tpai', ;¥t;r, 8; did us m uch s-C?od-great meeti ~A'; In APfil not holding this against t hem becau~.~ If I "il,ftcr ~j>IIVIIJ!f ~refl,d-;Harden;mn GQll!)ge,, }a'{t II e'rl5oyM w1Jr1l:' ' wlth b'~e tllren at 'Baytown, \ihd Judh ~ ta't~e lloc:triAe ali' tllclrs, I ,woulci.
y~ar t \VI/fit l?tq, evangelistic wo,r;lt ,tpr ~hp T ex:u,j. Jack Har dcastle a nd Jim 0. Herod be afraid for my memberA to h cnlr fu'e truth;
~h\lrcb at 'Ye\vqlca, Okla homa. This worlc w ere of Inestimable worth to the mee ting. too. 'VIlh all m ight be done agains t us, the was under the dlr~,ction ot th<?Se eiQ!lrfl, anq Brother Hardcastle is local minister there, wot·lt Is g rowing, our crowds are la rger, was supported by old B rother James Mulkey. a nd Brother Herod of Grapela nd, T~xns. led our collectiqns are double. We have spent a member ot that P,Ongregatloll. Many mee t- the songs. Also enjo:l'ed a meellng 'with hun~ red~ of d o ll:>rs In mission work, helping tngs w ere held thrqughout the summer and H enry Street congregation In Greenville, Te x- three homes, and sending money to help fall, anti a good number were converted. Last as, where my fath er, W. E. Starnes. Is local bulld the Poter Orphan Home at Bowling Octobot· I came to Hous t on and nm now en- evangelist. Brother Woodrow ~handl er of Grecf1, ICentucloY. So the good work moves rolled In the Unlversity of:' Houston, ;preach- Greenvllle led Cine song service~. Three baP- onward. 'I ·will soon complete my second tng out from here on Sunday. I have an tlzed In Bay t own, six In GreenvlllP. Several year and may stay another. The Lord has open date for a meeting ~he last two weel~fl made public acknowledgements in both meet- bedn gcrod to us with his blessing that we In August ir any one wants me." ings." be a blessing to others."
Page Fourteen FIRM FOUNDATION Voyd N. Ballard, Coalinga, Ca lifornia, :May H. llcDonald, Sils bee, Tex as, May 8 : "I 1: "Last L ord's da y, April 29 th, B1·other movea h e re J a nuary 20, 1945, with a de t erHugh Ous ley, minis t er of the church In Lind· mlna tion to do a ll I could In the vineyard of s ay, Ca lifornia, and I exchanged pulpits . I the Lord. The members hAre have a will to enjoyed my visit with the church In Lindsay work, however our n eed a t presen t Is mor e v ery much. The church h er e in Coalinga, than we a re a bla to do. But we are put t ing apprecia ted Brother Ous ley's visit and the forth every e Cfort possible, and W•" believe l essons he b rought. One lady was restored with the hel p of the Lord W•1 will finll;h the to the fellowship of the church he re under job tha t Is now before WJ. We have bought Brother Ousl ey's prea ch ing In the ev ening a g ood location In town with a g ood s ize h ou se s ervice. We think our work h e re In Coal- en l t. We have rlOved t h <• p resen t church lnga Is moving along we ll. We ha ve pla ns h uuse to this lot and ha \'e jU:>t flnls hetl a ma de to do some n eeded r epair work on the wall{ In f r ont of It. This meeti <l ~ t ou!le Is building . Last w eek we Inst a lled two new only ~ · x36, but we a re d'llnl{ wh ~ ~ we t•a n coolers in the church building here. All tha t until we can do bette r. We p lan several ha ve ever b een In Coalinga during t h e sum- me etings this summe r. The church has p a id 1n er months can a pprecia te h ow much theee s ince I came $1500.00 on the lots and $350.00
cooler s a re n eed ed. I plan to be In Oxn a rd, t o move t he building. Now we pla n to build Ca lifornia, the last of May to preach In the a b out H f eet onto t he building as we need r t:gula r f ourth Monday night meeting e! the mor e space, until we can b uild a new buildVentura County churches of Chris t, which lng. The VIdor church Is help ing pay my meeting Is h eld In the IOOF . Ha ll In Ox- salary. ·w e a r e g r ateful t o t h em. The re h as na rd. Coa linga Is a fine church t o work b een s ince the f irs t of the year two baptized, with, and w e appreciate their co-op er a tion eeven r es tored and five to place membe r s h ip.
In the work ot the L ord. P eace and ha rmony Br ot her Guy McDonald of W est Side C"h urch prevail In the church h er e, and a ll s eem will- In Beaumont , Tex as, beg ins a mee ting May lng to do their part." 9th. 'Ve ask y our prayers in this work."
NEW T ESTAMENT :
Greek-English Interlinear By GEORGE RICKER BERRY Unlvel"Sity or Chicago and Colgate Unive rsitY, D epartment of Semitic lAnguages • DESCRIPTION •
Size: 6 x 9. Over 800 p ages. B ound in green buckram, gold stamped.
Contains a uthorized vers ion, N ew Testament, in English.
Conta ins complet e Greek text o r New Testament.
It also ...
E ach Greek word bas its Eng \is h word immedia tely u n d e r i t.
I t contains a Greek -E nglish L exicon o f 1 37 pages .
... contains synonyms w ith discussion of them-the word is given in Elnglish and the Greek word from which the English word is translated is g iven and discussed as to various meanings.
There are footnote references and readings !rom Elzevir, Griesba ch, Laehman, Tischendor!, Tregelles, Alford, and Wordaworth.
With the Greek Interlinear you cam better understand critical discus11iona in commentaries.
The Greek Interlinear often s enes aa a oommentary itsel!-giving you ocrigin and literal meaning.
The plan and form of this Greek-Kn«lish Interlinear is fully explained in the introduction.
PRICE: Only $4.00 Prepaid FIRM FOUNDATION PUBLISHING HOUSE Austin, Texas Tuesday, May 22, 1945
W . B. Andrews , W. L. Oliph a nt and Rue Por ter wer e tho s peak e rs In a s pecial meetIng a t t he Centra l church In Dalha rt, Texas, April 16 to 21.
G. B. Barne tt, Three Rive rs , Texa.'!, llay l:
" ' V. R. Swinney o f Devin e, Tex as, cloeed a meeting her e Sunday nigh t. Guy Weldon McGee of Geor ge Wes t, Texas, directed the song ser v ice. One was bapti zed. Bomar B.
Gis t o f George Wes t preaches for us every T uesday night."
J. D. McCask ill, 1H Duke Stree t, Yoakum, Texas, May 8 : "The chur ch o f Christ at Yoakum, Tex a s , is In n eed of a mll'lll!lter . Any one In t er est ed ple ase con ta ct the church a t Yoaltum, Texas . Address all eommunlcatie ns to J . D. McCas ltill, 1H D uke Street, YonJ(um, 'l'exas. If you s hould ha ppen t o k n ow o! a ny on e t hat you think oould a erve us he r e, please let me know. T ha nl<ing you for a ny s uggest ions."
F la \'II R. Yeakle y, 2223 X P eak Street, Da llas, Texas, :\fay 1: "Las t Sunday W ltl!l In t eresting a t H ig hla nd Park in Dallas. The a ud ie nces we re some larger th an ueual and c \'eryonc e n t er ed into t he serv ices in a s plendid way. There we re two baptisms a t the even ing serv ice. The r e is m uch yet we need tn do, b u t e very bit of progr eAs Is en couraging to u s. T he work h e r e looks bright and t he chur ch wori{S tog eth er In a fine ha rmony that is not too often seen. We a re-praying tha t w e cnn make much progres l!l for the Lord t h is y ear."
Clyde E . Riley, 501 E. Broadway, Anadar lm, Okla homa , ::'lay 7: "Had a tine day y esterda y. IM'lrge c r owds at both services a nd fa ir turn out for bu s in e~s meeting In t he a rtc•·noen. T h e re wer e two res ponses to t he Invita tion y est erday mor ning-one r e t urned t o h is f ll·st lo\'e by confession of peglir,-ence of d u ty, one placed members hiJl a fte •· mo\' lng h e re la s t weclc T he ch ur ch w o•·king ns a whole is getting r esu lts and we >11'e s triving a nd pra y ing for g reater r e t urns in the n ear fu t u r e. I am to begi n a meeting nt Cemen t, l\fay 18. We h ope to b uild that !'mall g •·o up up in the fa ith and g a in souls for Chris t du1·ing this meeting ."
Teddy R. Va ug han, P. 0. Box 1225, Reno, XP\'ada: "Arrl\'ed in th e city of Reno to begin wo1·k on April 1, and fo und a n excellent g 1·oup or Chris t ia ns we rltlng together In the vineya 1·d of the Lor d. I am h a ppy to find an even la r ger membe r ship tha n was expect ed.
We h a ve be en blessed with f our additions during th e fo ur weeks of labor thus fa r: th ree by member ship, one confessing f a ults, a nd one by baptism. Atte ndan ce continues t o g row a nd a lso our contributions. Las t Sunday eve ning we had r ecord atte lldance, a s also la s t night for mid-we ek Bible etudy.
Our f irs t b roadca st w e n t on the air oTer the loca l s ta tion, KOH, 630 k ilocycles, last Sat urday morn ing a t 10:15. This Is t o be a weekly broadcast. I am Indeed grateful tor the wonder ful and v e ry coope rative leaderehlp or this congr egation , Br oth er Otto G. Harrle a nd Brother W. B. Bak er. Also for the r;reat help of the service men . I find th em very dependable In every way and they fllled Jn with s ermons d u r ing the time this cong r egation was withou t a r e g ula r preach e r. We a s k t he praye r s of a ll the Chris tia ns tha t the work In R eno ma y g row In the s p ir it oC the L ord and may be flr mty es tablis hed In a g reat er work in th is community. We a ppre c ia te t he ma ny le tte rs of encouragel'l:le•t !rom br e t hr en with w hich I have formerly la b ored a nd hope w e may continue to h ear fro• them f r om time to time."
Tuesday, May 22, 1945
E>. Lacy Porte r, West P lains, Missouri, l\Iay 7: "'£he meeting at Roy, Miss ouri, closed las t Wednesday nig ht, without any vis ible r esults. We had good atte ndance part of the time, but was hindered by cool rainy weath er. I am now back a t West Plains with my r egular work. We had a good sen ·lce yeste rday."
Guy V. Caskey, 217 North Warr en, Pampa, Texas, May 2: "There w er e e le ven additions to this congregation during the month of April. Six of t his number p laced membership, three were res t or ed and two were baptized.
Four confessed sins and one was baptized In the short meeting with the Childr ess church. E ight wer e baptized In the meeting at Terrell."
Robert L. Allen, J a l, New Mexico, May ~:
"The work or the Lord goes we )] h e re, malclng slow progress. Last Lord's day another 11oul was baptized Into t he Chris t . Our class worlc is doing ni cely. T he Ladies' B ible class Is us ing Brother Roy E. Cogdill's outlines on the 'New Testament Church.' It is a fine work. No one can study the New Testament with its h elp without growing in grace."
Tice Elkins. r\lamogor do, New Mexico, :May 6: " Please !!'ivo me room to !lay t hat Alamogordo is In g reat need of a good physician, a r.1an who knows medicine and what to do with It. We have lost our doctors to the war and by other ways, until we have only two M. D.'s, an m; tcopath and one chiropractor, for a popula tion of five or six thousand.
There Is a nlco suite of rooms formerly u sed IJy doctors now vacant. We al so need a nother d entis t, ns we have but one and he cannot take C'an, of a ll who n eed him. For further informat ion wr ite Tlce Elkins, Box 31!'
G. S. Westbrook, Cisco, Texas, May 3: "One who ha d b een r e fus ing to partalce of the Lvrd's supper for a long time was r estored recently, and seems very happy In making the r eturn. Th is unites a fine family In the Lord's work. Our crowds have been good for sev eral Sundays p ut not so large as they w e re for a time. Had a goodly number of vis itors from ol her places, some of w hom have ma de good contributions to our building fund. It has grown rapidl y and we are wa ft ing only f or completion or p lan~ he rore we let the contraC" t Cor constr u ction. I leave Jun e 1, for three months of meetin gs, but as the folks he re a re the Lor d's discip les, and not mine, A 1 expect them to carry on the worlt with banner attendance."
A. 0. Colley, 2204 Buchanan Stree t , Wichita F alls, Texas: On Sunday nig ht, April 2:1 I b egan a meeting at Saymour, Texas, w ith the church that B rother Otta Johnson prea ches for ami labors with. The meeting was well advertised, both locally and over our radio program (KWFT) and everything s tarted off good. We did not have to 'w ork up an Interest' for It was r eady when I arrived. I only preached eight days, but we bad two services dally which was h eld at ~ :00 p.m. for t he adva ntage of the school c hildre n , who a ttended we ll each a fte rnoon. The other service was held at 8:30 p.m. The re were nine conversions.
Four of these were f rom 'the error of their ways' and the other five by confessing and baptism. The church at Seymour Is a good church and Is h elping In a very good way to preach the gospel ,bo t h at h ome and In some miss ion fi elds. W e h ope much good was clone aside from the visible good r e f erred to above.''
FIRM FOUNDATION ,., T. R. Bankhead, Pendleton, Oregon, May 7 :
"After a few w eelts delay, we a rrived on this new brok en field Aprll 22. Brother and Sis ter Joe F. Coppinger of Walla Walla, 'Vas hlng ton, a nd the little resident band, have truly )lroken t he ground h er e, a nd we are off to a good s ta rt. 'l,'o all who have had a par t In this work (and we trust Lhat you will continue) we pledge you tha t It s ha ll not have been In vain on our part. ·we expect to lceep ~'O U In formed tht·ough the pa pers ov by le tte r , of a ll our c!forts. God's blessings e n courage us al l.''
G. S. Westbrook, 1106 W. Seven~h St~ C,·
Cisco, Texas, May 1: "L.'\s t Su nqi}n: ·a~/116.
~oon a. g roup f rom Cisco met wiH\JolJH\ o&f' G mpevme sch ool house, a few ml'l(jl~ OV~\1 qflf!
he lped th em in the ini tial ser,ylql\dP..!'u fl:\e chur ch a t t hat p lace. One of th~,,;v,o~l!1&'u DWJ\ or the congregation, Da-rvin Krii\Ol~J~<PljflJ11;
!sed the church at Grapevlnt:t .. ,])~p,..,~er,y~\i'lil each Lord's da y. H e will be gi~[Wt , H!l~f.;.
His father, J . A. Kris ell, one o&1p u~11 ~;;to~IW• p t·enclled a t Grapevine last ~Hf%r.1 , TiJJlt?~
are other p laces n car her e Wjl,.hOIWntO r .. ~~fi~ ere long.''
Announcing The Lesson Topics of Our New Series of BIBLE SCHOOL LITERATURE For the Third Quarter, 1945
(July, August, September) STUDIES IN GENESIS Presenting- God in Creation.
God in the Lives of Men.
God in the Preservation of His People.
July 1:
July 8:
July 15:
July 22:
July 29 :
August 5:
August 12:
August 19:
August 26:
September 2:
September 9 :
September 16:
September 23 :
September 30 :
"God's Joy in Creation.''
"Man's Failures and God's Promises."
"God's Purpose for Abraham."
"Abraham's Practice of Brotherhood.''
"God's Promise of a Nation."
"Isaac's Heritage."
"Isaac's Testimony to God."
"Jacob Realizes the Presence of God.''
"Jacob Adjusts Personal Relationships."
"Joseph's Place in G<:>d's Plan.''
"Egypt's Part in God's Plan."
"Judah's Concern for His Family."
"Joseph's Testimony to God's Providence."
"The Israelites in a Foreign Land.''
1..
Each lesson is built upon a Biblical text. All comments and interpretations of this text are made by our editors, who are faithful members of the church of Christ.
Churches should order now. The order blank on page 16 may be used.
FIRM FOUNDATION PUBLISHING HOUSE Box 77- Austin 1, Texas Page Sixieen FIRM FOUND A TION J. c. Foster, Neosh o, Missouri, April 26: Cine way. A real good lot was pur chased "The .-burch of Christ worshipping at 114 yesterday at the cost of $5,000.00. This lot Is Sou th J e tfe rson Street , closed a good meet- In the cent er of a good residential section, lng on Apr il 1. P r ea ching was done by Z. and a corner lot, with much parking space.
D. Barb er of Newport, Arltansas. The at- The churoh Intends to build a modern house tendance and Inte r est :(rom the begin ning was to carry on t he program of' the Lord In this ·even be tter tha n we h ad expected. However, ~m u ch prepa r a tion.. had been made for the town. We hope to be able to build In as short .meeting, w hich no doubt, was the cause of a time as possible under present conditions. 1thi11 f r om the )>eglnnlng. Five were bap- The church launched a building program ''tllled u pon the con fession of their faith in April 22, with an inlta l fund of $1200.00 and Christ and one was r estored. The church h ere Is evidently going forward In a very to this was added that day $959.39."
ORDER BLANK FOR IMPROVED UNIFORM LESSONS BIBLE SCH00L SERIES Date ______________________________ l9 ___ I!'!RH FOUNDATION PUBLISHING HOUSE, Aus tin, Texas Please enter the~ following order to be sent to the address below:
• or ----------- - months, from ______________ 1 9---- to------- --·- - - -------
·-·- - - ------------ - - --------- 19 ----
)t~r.me ___ - ------------~- - ·- -- - - --· --------------------P. 0·------------------------------------------
Remltta n ce enclosed to pay tor this o r der _ ______________ _____ , ___________ for !fhe Pre-School Children _____ Lesson Picture Cha r t'S (ages 4 to 6 ) , $1.25 per q uarter_ ______ $ ______ _ ____ Lesson Picture Ca rds ( ages 4 to 6). 6c p er quar t er ____________ , ______ ____ Pri-mary Bible Stories ( a ges 4 to 6), 10c p er quar t er_ ________ , _ ______ _____ Bible Lessons for Children ( a ges 4 to 6), 10c; 12 copies $1.00 ___ , _______ For the Primary Children I _ _____ sun beams ( ages 6-7 , g rades 1 & 2 ), 12c each per q u a rter_ ______ $ ________ 1
_____ PriiDary Qua r terly (ages 7-8, g rades 2 & :l). 6c per quar ter _____ $ ________ I For the Intennediates _____ The Intermediate Quar~erly (ages 12, 13 & 14, grades 7, 8 & 9), 6c $-------- I h~~~ I The J unior Quarterly ( ages 9 , 1 0 & 11, gr ades 4, 6 & 6 ), lOc 1
--- --- pe r quarter ----------- -------------------------------- . $~-------
~~~~ I _ _____ The Senior Qu a rterly (ages 1 5-18, g r a des 10, 11), 10c p er q uart er __ $ ________ 1
For Young People a:nd Adults _______ The Advanced Qua rterly , 12c per q ua rter - ----------------$--------
For Teachers and Adult Classes ______ Firm Fou·n d a tion Bible Teach er, 25 cents the copy, or 20 cents each 1
!or 5 o r more cop ies ----- ------------- -----------------$ - - - - - ---
Department of Studies by Subjects, Outlines, al!d Questions 1
---- - -"Simplified Bible L essons ," by G. H. P. S howalter and W. M. Davis, I copy, 60 cents ; dozen , $5.6 0 ---------------- --------------~--------
--- --"Bible Studies," by J . D. Ta nt, co py, 60 cents; dozen , $5.50 _____ , ________ I -----· ~Bible Brief s-Book One," a n outline book of Bible Stud ies, by G. H. P. Showalter and W. M. Davis, copy , 50c; dozen, $4.50 ___ $ _ ______ _ 1
- - ---"Bible Brie~s-Bo o k T wo," a new bo ok, sim ilar to Book One, copy , 1
60c ; dozen , $4.&0-- ----- - ----- ----------------- ----------$ ______ - - ---'"Bible Wome n," by Co leman Overby. A new book of subject o ut- 1
lines and a. discussion of the names a nd lives of a ll women mentioned In t h e Bi ble. A very comprehens1ve study. P1"ices: I Paper, copy, 3 0c; dozen , $3.50; c loth, copy, 60c; d ozen, $ 6.00 __ $ ______ _
("Ideal Womanhood" and " Bible Women" are widely used for 1
I '. any .:la-sses , 'but a r e especi a lly popula r for L adles' c lasses. )
_____ "Scr iptura l Surveys ," by Coleman Ove r by, 152 pp. A ser ies o! fiftytwo lessons on the Bi ble. A new approach and a new line of Scripture lessons cov ering the entire Bible. Illustrated by sev- I eral original diagrams. Prices: Paper, 60c; dozen , $5.0 0 ;
cloth, $1.00 per co py ; dozen . $12.00 ______________________ $_ ______ I Plea.~e note t hat our Uter ature iB completel1f gradea. We belte11e we are th& on!)l aosae rl<>1D Pt'bl!.!!M ng the Jm:proved Unif orm Lessom, completelv gradea. 1
Tuesday, May 22, 1945
Ray Otey, Belle Plain e, Kansas: "f am now preaching t hree Sundays each month at Peck, Kansa~. An old congregation that years ago was very strong, but like many small town congregations, decreased in number s. Interest Is growing." ;Ray sends us a fine club of s ubscribers. Thanks. And reader r emember that in clubs o~- six or more th~ club rate is $1.50. Why not make up a list In your community?
Roy L. Fout z, L evelland, Texas, May 7:
.. The meeting at Grassland, near Tahoka, closed last night. One m:m was baptized a nd his wife made confession or her s ins. I enjoyed the able assistance of I3 r·other J . I.
Parham of Lubbock, who Jed the sing ing. I am to begin at Sunray, Texas, next Friday nig-ht. Brother vVnlter H. Adams, dean of Abilene Christian College, will preach here in L e vella nd next Sunday,' l\lay 13."
Herbert L ove, Ysleta, Texas, May 8:
"Three were baptized and one r estored r ecently at t ho North Loop church of Chrl~t.
El Pnso, Texas. This brings the total to 29 a dditions to our· worldng fo rce since 1l moved h ere In October. Nine of these were by baptism, five were restored, and the balance was by t r a nsrer o r membership. Brother J P. Sewell of San Antonio was pr esen t tor out· mid-weelt service last w eek. It was my pr·i vilege to have been associated with him as minister of the Grove Avenue chu rch of Christ in San Antonio. During that time I learned to love him and res pect him as a God-fearing man ...
Athclston Cr·owson, Booneville, Mississ ippi, April 30: .. The work at Booneville continues _
to show marked signs of progress. There Is greater cooperation and more pnrtlclpntlon by men who have not always accepted respon>"
ibillty or taken an active par·t In the work.
The last wee!< in March we enjoyed a lecture seri es of gospel lessons f r·om tho> following min isters: :\Ia urice M. Howe ll, George \V. DeHoff, Tamco; 0. Baird, Flavl l Nichols, John D.
Cox. C. P. Roland, and Chas. Houser. 'l'hese co,·e r ed the general s ubjects of Inspiration.
the chur·ch, and Chris tia n education. Many have ~> xpressed th emselves as having enjoyed a. spiritual feast In the fi ne lessons that we re presented."
Lulber Nor·man, Gatesville, Texas, April 23: .. On A prll 15th I closed my worlt with the church at Hamilton and began at Gatesville the next day. My work with the Hamilton congregation of nea rly th ree years dur a Lion was as pleasant as any I ever had or ever hope to enjoy. They are a wonderful group of brethren and know how to t rent a preacher and his wife. \Ve left Hamilton 1 feel s ur· e, with the love and respect of all llH clutrch as well as the general public. We were ln,·ited to stay, at least un t il September, JU4G. but felt It mJght be best for tho cause for us to come to ibis new fleld. The congregation at Gatesville Is >'mall, but f'ull of zeal and n tnind to wor·Jr. Brotber Wallace Cooch, a mos t excellent young preacher and defender of the faith, has recently moved from Gatesville to ,tal<e up t he work of one of the newer, g rowing congr egations. Brother Gooch labored with this church for almost fou r years and did a very fine and lasting serv ice. It is my hope and prayer t hat the church ma:r continue to grow both numerically and spir i t ually.
The building Is already lnadequte and i t i,; the desire and aim of the brethren to build a more commodious plant In the near future. Brethr en, let us press on to greater things."